2155 | confident (adjective): sure of yourself and not afraid | loc: kendine güvenen
  EN TS: That confident smile works.
  tr TS: Bu kendine güvenen gülüş işe yarıyor.
  EN FS: That nervous smile works.
  tr FS: Bu gergin gülüş işe yarıyor.
  EN TP: a confident half-smile
  tr TP: kendine güvenen bir yarım gülüş
  EN FP: a confident loud laugh
  tr FP: kendine güvenen yüksek bir kahkaha
2156 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: ufuk
  EN TS: The sun sits on the horizon.
  tr TS: Güneş ufukta duruyor.
  EN FS: The moon sits on the horizon.
  tr FS: Ay ufukta duruyor.
  EN TP: the sun on the horizon
  tr TP: ufukta güneş
  EN FP: a ship on the horizon
  tr FP: ufukta bir gemi
2157 | india (noun): a large country in South Asia | loc: Hindistan
  EN TS: A baby from India wears gold.
  tr TS: Hindistan'dan bir bebek, altınlar içinde.
  EN FS: A baby from India wears red.
  tr FS: Hindistan'dan bir bebek, kırmızılar içinde.
  EN TP: a painting from India
  tr TP: Hindistan'dan bir tablo
  EN FP: a carpet from India
  tr FP: Hindistan'dan bir halı
2158 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: başörtüsü
  EN TS: Love the orange headscarf!
  tr TS: Turuncu başörtüsüne bayıldım!
  EN FS: Love the blue headscarf!
  tr FS: Mavi başörtüsüne bayıldım!
  EN TP: an orange headscarf
  tr TP: turuncu bir başörtüsü
  EN FP: taking off a headscarf
  tr FP: başörtüsünü çıkarmak
2159 | majestic (adjective): grand and impressive, like a king | loc: görkemli
  EN TS: The cat feels very majestic.
  tr TS: Kedi kendini çok görkemli hissediyor.
  EN FS: The dog feels very majestic.
  tr FS: Köpek kendini çok görkemli hissediyor.
  EN TP: a majestic cat
  tr TP: görkemli bir kedi
  EN FP: a majestic lion
  tr FP: görkemli bir aslan
2161 | genius (noun): an exceptionally intelligent person | loc: dâhi
  EN TS: The genius has a new idea.
  tr TS: Dâhinin yeni bir fikri var.
  EN FS: The genius has a new cat.
  tr FS: Dâhinin yeni bir kedisi var.
  EN TP: a genius gazing at stars
  tr TP: yıldızlara bakan bir dâhi
  EN FP: a genius writing formulas
  tr FP: formül yazan bir dâhi
2162 | ginger (adjective): having orange-red hair | loc: kızıl saçlı | translator note: loc adjective 'kızıl saçlı' used as 'kızıl saç(lar)' because the text is about the hair itself
  EN TS: Her ginger hair looks perfect.
  tr TS: Kızıl saçları kusursuz görünüyor.
  EN FS: Her black hair looks perfect.
  tr FS: Siyah saçları kusursuz görünüyor.
  EN TP: long ginger hair in waves
  tr TP: dalga dalga uzun kızıl saçlar
  EN FP: ginger hair in a bun
  tr FP: topuz yapılmış kızıl saçlar
2164 | woods (noun): an area of land covered with trees | loc: orman
  EN TS: A path goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  tr TS: Ormana bir patika uzanıyor. Kim önden gidiyor?
  EN FS: A river goes into the woods. Who wants to go first?
  tr FS: Ormana bir nehir uzanıyor. Kim önden gidiyor?
  EN TP: a path through the woods
  tr TP: ormanın içinden geçen bir patika
  EN FP: a cabin in the woods
  tr FP: ormanda bir kulübe
2172 | sports car (noun): a fast low car built for speed and fun | loc: spor araba
  EN TS: A sports car in a paint storm.
  tr TS: Boya fırtınasında bir spor araba.
  EN FS: A sports car in a snow storm.
  tr FS: Kar fırtınasında bir spor araba.
  EN TP: a dark-blue sports car
  tr TP: lacivert bir spor araba
  EN FP: a dark-blue family car
  tr FP: lacivert bir aile arabası
2174 | bloom (verb): to open flowers; to be full of flowers | loc: çiçek açmak
  EN TS: A tree is blooming in snow!
  tr TS: Karda bir ağaç çiçek açıyor!
  EN FS: A tree is burning in snow!
  tr FS: Karda bir ağaç yanıyor!
  EN TP: a tree blooming at night
  tr TP: gece çiçek açan bir ağaç
  EN FP: flowers blooming in spring
  tr FP: baharda çiçek açan çiçekler
2175 | midnight (noun): twelve o'clock at night | loc: gece yarısı
  EN TS: Midnight in the pine forest.
  tr TS: Çam ormanında gece yarısı.
  EN FS: Midnight in the desert.
  tr FS: Çölde gece yarısı.
  EN TP: midnight under the stars
  tr TP: yıldızların altında gece yarısı
  EN FP: a party at midnight
  tr FP: gece yarısı parti
2176 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: koridor
  EN TS: It is raining in the aisle!
  tr TS: Koridorda yağmur yağıyor!
  EN FS: It is snowing in the aisle!
  tr FS: Koridorda kar yağıyor!
  EN TP: a rainy library aisle
  tr TP: yağmurlu bir kütüphane koridoru
  EN FP: a busy supermarket aisle
  tr FP: kalabalık bir market koridoru
2177 | dj (noun): someone who plays and mixes recorded music | loc: DJ
  EN TS: Even the moon came for the DJ!
  tr TS: DJ için ay bile geldi!
  EN FS: Even the sun came for the DJ!
  tr FS: DJ için güneş bile geldi!
  EN TP: a DJ on the street
  tr TP: sokakta bir DJ
  EN FP: a DJ in a club
  tr FP: kulüpte bir DJ
2178 | peek (verb): to take a quick secret look from hiding | loc: gizlice bakmak
  EN TS: Psst, two cats are peeking.
  tr TS: Pşşt, iki kedi gizlice bakıyor.
  EN FS: Psst, two dogs are peeking.
  tr FS: Pşşt, iki köpek gizlice bakıyor.
  EN TP: peeking behind leaves
  tr TP: yaprakların arkasından gizlice bakmak
  EN FP: peeking through a window
  tr FP: pencereden gizlice bakmak
2181 | crowded (adjective): uncomfortably full of people | loc: tıklım tıklım
  EN TS: The street is way too crowded.
  tr TS: Sokak resmen tıklım tıklım.
  EN FS: The street is way too empty.
  tr FS: Sokak resmen bomboş.
  EN TP: a crowded neon street
  tr TP: tıklım tıklım neon bir sokak
  EN FP: a crowded train carriage
  tr FP: tıklım tıklım bir tren vagonu
2182 | hiker (noun): a person who walks long distances in nature | loc: yürüyüşçü
  EN TS: The hiker has a red backpack.
  tr TS: Yürüyüşçünün kırmızı bir sırt çantası var.
  EN FS: The hiker has a blue backpack.
  tr FS: Yürüyüşçünün mavi bir sırt çantası var.
  EN TP: a hiker on a ledge
  tr TP: kaya çıkıntısında bir yürüyüşçü
  EN FP: a hiker in a tent
  tr FP: çadırda bir yürüyüşçü
2184 | roar (verb): to make a loud, deep angry cry | loc: kükremek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The tiger is roaring!
  tr TS: Kaplan kükrüyor!
  EN FS: The lion is roaring!
  tr FS: Aslan kükrüyor!
  EN TP: a roaring tiger
  tr TP: kükreyen bir kaplan
  EN FP: a sleeping tiger
  tr FP: uyuyan bir kaplan
2185 | pianist (noun): a person who plays the piano | loc: piyanist
  EN TS: The pianist has blonde hair.
  tr TS: Piyanistin sarı saçları var.
  EN FS: The pianist has black hair.
  tr FS: Piyanistin siyah saçları var.
  EN TP: a pianist at the piano
  tr TP: piyano başında bir piyanist
  EN FP: a pianist at a keyboard
  tr FP: klavye başında bir piyanist
2186 | thorn (noun): a sharp spike growing on a plant stem | loc: diken
  EN TS: Jesus wears a crown of thorns.
  tr TS: İsa dikenlerden bir taç takıyor.
  EN FS: Jesus wears a crown of gold.
  tr FS: İsa altından bir taç takıyor.
  EN TP: a crown of thorns
  tr TP: dikenlerden bir taç
  EN FP: a rose with thorns
  tr FP: dikenli bir gül
2187 | buddha (noun): the founder of Buddhism, shown meditating | loc: Buda
  EN TS: Buddha is meditating.
  tr TS: Buda meditasyon yapıyor.
  EN FS: Buddha is dancing.
  tr FS: Buda dans ediyor.
  EN TP: Buddha meditating
  tr TP: meditasyon yapan Buda
  EN FP: Buddha lying down
  tr FP: uzanmış Buda
2188 | cry (verb): to shed tears because of sadness or pain | loc: ağlamak
  EN TS: The boy is crying, Mom isn't.
  tr TS: Oğlan ağlıyor, annesi ağlamıyor.
  EN FS: The boy is singing, Mom isn't.
  tr FS: Oğlan şarkı söylüyor, annesi söylemiyor.
  EN TP: crying on a bike
  tr TP: bisiklette ağlamak
  EN FP: crying in bed
  tr FP: yatakta ağlamak
2189 | fall overboard (phrase): to fall off a boat into the water | loc: denize düşmek
  EN TS: Someone is falling overboard!
  tr TS: Biri denize düşüyor!
  EN FS: Someone is diving overboard!
  tr FS: Biri denize atlıyor!
  EN TP: falling overboard backwards
  tr TP: sırtüstü denize düşmek
  EN FP: falling asleep in the boat
  tr FP: teknede uyuyakalmak
2190 | villain (noun): an evil character in a story or film | loc: kötü adam
  EN TS: This villain has flaming eyes.
  tr TS: Bu kötü adamın gözleri alev alev.
  EN FS: This villain has blue eyes.
  tr FS: Bu kötü adamın gözleri masmavi.
  EN TP: a villain in burning ruins
  tr TP: yanan yıkıntılarda bir kötü adam
  EN FP: a villain in a castle
  tr FP: şatoda bir kötü adam
2191 | android (noun): a robot built to look like a human | loc: android
  EN TS: The android has a human face.
  tr TS: Androidin insan yüzü var.
  EN FS: The android has a long beard.
  tr FS: Androidin uzun sakalı var.
  EN TP: a glowing female android
  tr TP: parlayan bir kadın android
  EN FP: an android in a kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta bir android
2192 | flask (noun): a narrow-necked glass container for liquids | loc: cam şişe
  EN TS: Harry Potter would love these flasks.
  tr TS: Harry Potter bu cam şişelere bayılırdı.
  EN FS: Harry Potter would love these brooms.
  tr FS: Harry Potter bu süpürgelere bayılırdı.
  EN TP: glowing glass flasks
  tr TP: parlayan cam şişeler
  EN FP: a thermos flask
  tr FP: bir termos
2194 | tropical (adjective): from the hot wet regions near the equator | loc: tropikal
  EN TS: Tropical leaves are big. Wow.
  tr TS: Tropikal yapraklar büyük. Vay.
  EN FS: Tropical leaves are tiny. Wow.
  tr FS: Tropikal yapraklar minicik. Vay.
  EN TP: dense tropical leaves
  tr TP: sık tropikal yapraklar
  EN FP: a tropical beach
  tr FP: tropikal bir plaj
2195 | watercolor (noun): water-based paint, and pictures made with it | loc: suluboya
  EN TS: The watercolor is dripping.
  tr TS: Suluboya akıyor.
  EN FS: The oil paint is dripping.
  tr FS: Yağlı boya akıyor.
  EN TP: a watercolor portrait
  tr TP: suluboya bir portre
  EN FP: a watercolor landscape
  tr FP: suluboya bir manzara
2199 | delicate (adjective): fine, soft and easily damaged | loc: narin
  EN TS: Delicate roses everywhere!
  tr TS: Her yerde narin güller!
  EN FS: Delicate tulips everywhere!
  tr FS: Her yerde narin laleler!
  EN TP: delicate pink roses
  tr TP: narin pembe güller
  EN FP: a delicate glass vase
  tr FP: narin bir cam vazo
2200 | elegant (adjective): graceful and stylish to look at | loc: şık
  EN TS: She looks elegant in her gown.
  tr TS: Gece elbisesiyle çok şık görünüyor.
  EN FS: She looks elegant in her coat.
  tr FS: Montuyla çok şık görünüyor.
  EN TP: an elegant flowing gown
  tr TP: şık, dökümlü bir gece elbisesi
  EN FP: an elegant black suit
  tr FP: şık siyah bir takım elbise
2201 | orange (adjective): having the color between red and yellow | loc: turuncu
  EN TS: Her orange armour is so cool!
  tr TS: Turuncu zırhı çok havalı!
  EN FS: Her pink armour is so cool!
  tr FS: Pembe zırhı çok havalı!
  EN TP: orange hair and armour
  tr TP: turuncu saç ve zırh
  EN FP: an orange in her hand
  tr FP: elinde bir portakal
2202 | smart (adjective): neat and well-dressed, not scruffy | loc: şık
  EN TS: His white blazer looks smart.
  tr TS: Beyaz blazer ceketi çok şık duruyor.
  EN FS: His red blazer looks smart.
  tr FS: Kırmızı blazer ceketi çok şık duruyor.
  EN TP: a smart white blazer
  tr TP: şık beyaz bir blazer
  EN FP: a smart dark suit
  tr FP: şık koyu bir takım
2204 | lamb (noun): a baby sheep | loc: kuzu
  EN TS: He is holding a lamb.
  tr TS: Kucağında bir kuzu tutuyor.
  EN FS: He is holding a dog.
  tr FS: Kucağında bir köpek tutuyor.
  EN TP: a lamb in his arms
  tr TP: kollarında bir kuzu
  EN FP: a lamb in a field
  tr FP: tarlada bir kuzu
2207 | point (verb): to indicate a direction or thing with your finger | loc: işaret etmek
  EN TS: The robot hand is pointing.
  tr TS: Robot el işaret ediyor.
  EN FS: The robot hand is waving.
  tr FS: Robot el sallıyor.
  EN TP: pointing at a screen
  tr TP: ekranı işaret etmek
  EN FP: pointing at the sky
  tr FP: gökyüzünü işaret etmek
2208 | pink (adjective): a light shade of red | loc: pembe
  EN TS: Her hair is bright pink.
  tr TS: Saçı parlak pembe.
  EN FS: Her hair is bright green.
  tr FS: Saçı parlak yeşil.
  EN TP: bright pink hair
  tr TP: parlak pembe saç
  EN FP: a bright pink dress
  tr FP: parlak pembe bir elbise
2211 | trident (noun): a spear with three sharp points | loc: üç dişli mızrak
  EN TS: Guess who has a trident? The sea god.
  tr TS: Bil bakalım kimde üç dişli mızrak var? Deniz tanrısında.
  EN FS: Guess who has a hammer? The sea god.
  tr FS: Bil bakalım kimde çekiç var? Deniz tanrısında.
  EN TP: a god with a trident
  tr TP: üç dişli mızraklı bir tanrı
  EN FP: a trident in the sand
  tr FP: kumda üç dişli bir mızrak
2212 | stripes (noun): long thin lines of a different color | loc: çizgiler
  EN TS: Nice stripes, tiger!
  tr TS: Güzel çizgiler, kaplan!
  EN FS: Nice spots, tiger!
  tr FS: Güzel benekler, kaplan!
  EN TP: a tiger with black stripes
  tr TP: siyah çizgili bir kaplan
  EN FP: a zebra with black stripes
  tr FP: siyah çizgili bir zebra
2213 | ram (noun): a male sheep with big curved horns | loc: koç
  EN TS: Fact: rams have curly horns.
  tr TS: Bilgi: koçların kıvrık boynuzları var.
  EN FS: Fact: rams have flat horns.
  tr FS: Bilgi: koçların düz boynuzları var.
  EN TP: a ram with curly horns
  tr TP: kıvrık boynuzlu bir koç
  EN FP: a ram eating grass
  tr FP: ot yiyen bir koç
2214 | through (preposition): from one side of an opening to the other | loc: içinden | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: I can see a castle through it.
  tr TS: İçinden bir şato görebiliyorum.
  EN FS: I can see a church through it.
  tr FS: İçinden bir kilise görebiliyorum.
  EN TP: looking through a rock hole
  tr TP: kaya deliğinin içinden bakmak
  EN FP: looking through a window
  tr FP: pencereden bakmak
2216 | altar (noun): a raised table where people pray | loc: sunak
  EN TS: She is praying at an altar.
  tr TS: Bir sunakta dua ediyor.
  EN FS: She is singing at an altar.
  tr FS: Bir sunakta şarkı söylüyor.
  EN TP: praying at a candlelit altar
  tr TP: mumlu bir sunakta dua etmek
  EN FP: getting married at the altar
  tr FP: sunakta evlenmek
2217 | spell (noun): words or power used to make magic happen | loc: büyü
  EN TS: She's casting a spell. Cool.
  tr TS: Büyü yapıyor. Havalı.
  EN FS: She's casting a net. Cool.
  tr FS: Ağ atıyor. Havalı.
  EN TP: casting a magic spell
  tr TP: sihirli bir büyü yapmak
  EN FP: a spell of bad weather
  tr FP: bir büyü kitabı okumak
2218 | circuit (noun): the path electricity follows on a board | loc: devre
  EN TS: Circuits are all around him.
  tr TS: Etrafı devrelerle dolu.
  EN FS: Flowers are all around him.
  tr FS: Etrafı çiçeklerle dolu.
  EN TP: glowing circuit lines
  tr TP: parlayan devre hatları
  EN FP: a race circuit
  tr FP: bir yarış pisti
2220 | count (verb): to find out the number or amount of something | loc: saymak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is counting the money carefully.
  tr TS: Parayı dikkatle sayıyor.
  EN FS: He is counting the coins carefully.
  tr FS: Bozuk paraları dikkatle sayıyor.
  EN TP: counting a stack of bills
  tr TP: bir deste banknot saymak
  EN FP: counting down the seconds
  tr FP: saniyeleri geri saymak
2224 | hold hands (phrase): to walk or stand with your fingers joined | loc: el ele tutuşmak
  EN TS: They are holding hands.
  tr TS: El ele tutuşuyorlar.
  EN FS: They are shaking hands.
  tr FS: Tokalaşıyorlar.
  EN TP: holding hands in the rain
  tr TP: yağmurda el ele tutuşmak
  EN FP: holding hands in the sun
  tr FP: güneşte el ele tutuşmak
2225 | soaked (adjective): completely wet, right through | loc: sırılsıklam
  EN TS: Poor girl, her hair is soaked.
  tr TS: Zavallı kız, saçları sırılsıklam.
  EN FS: Poor girl, her hair is dry.
  tr FS: Zavallı kız, saçları kupkuru.
  EN TP: soaked in heavy rain
  tr TP: sağanakta sırılsıklam
  EN FP: soaked in hot water
  tr FP: sıcak suda sırılsıklam
2226 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: bileklik
  EN TS: He has golden bracelets.
  tr TS: Altın bileklikleri var.
  EN FS: He has golden gloves.
  tr FS: Altın eldivenleri var.
  EN TP: golden bracelets on wrists
  tr TP: bileklerde altın bileklikler
  EN FP: a bracelet in a shop
  tr FP: dükkânda bir bileklik
2227 | glance (verb): to look at something quickly | loc: göz atmak
  EN TS: She is glancing back. At you?
  tr TS: Arkasına göz atıyor. Sana mı?
  EN FS: She is glancing down. At you?
  tr FS: Aşağıya göz atıyor. Sana mı?
  EN TP: glancing over her shoulder
  tr TP: omzunun üstünden göz atmak
  EN FP: glancing at her phone
  tr FP: telefonuna göz atmak
2228 | above (preposition): higher than something, over it | loc: üstünde
  EN TS: She is sitting above the city.
  tr TS: Şehrin üstünde oturuyor.
  EN FS: She is sitting above the sea.
  tr FS: Denizin üstünde oturuyor.
  EN TP: high above the city
  tr TP: şehrin çok üstünde
  EN FP: above the clouds
  tr FP: bulutların üstünde
2231 | sphinx (noun): an Egyptian statue: human head, lion body | loc: sfenks
  EN TS: A giant golden sphinx.
  tr TS: Dev bir altın sfenks.
  EN FS: A giant silver sphinx.
  tr FS: Dev bir gümüş sfenks.
  EN TP: a golden sphinx statue
  tr TP: altın bir sfenks heykeli
  EN FP: a sphinx cat sleeping
  tr FP: uyuyan bir sfenks kedisi
2232 | peaceful (adjective): not disturbed by fighting or trouble | loc: huzurlu
  EN TS: The Buddha looks peaceful.
  tr TS: Buda huzurlu görünüyor.
  EN FS: The Buddha looks angry.
  tr FS: Buda kızgın görünüyor.
  EN TP: a peaceful golden Buddha
  tr TP: huzurlu, altın bir Buda
  EN FP: a peaceful golden temple
  tr FP: huzurlu, altın bir tapınak
2233 | baseball (noun): a game where you hit a ball with a bat and run | loc: beyzbol
  EN TS: She has two baseball gloves.
  tr TS: İki beyzbol eldiveni var.
  EN FS: She has two baseball bats.
  tr FS: İki beyzbol sopası var.
  EN TP: baseball gloves in both hands
  tr TP: iki elinde beyzbol eldiveni
  EN FP: baseball on television
  tr FP: televizyonda beyzbol
2234 | muscles (noun): the strong parts that move your body | loc: kaslar
  EN TS: The warrior has big muscles.
  tr TS: Savaşçının kasları kocaman.
  EN FS: The warrior has a big shield.
  tr FS: Savaşçının kalkanı kocaman.
  EN TP: a warrior's big muscles
  tr TP: bir savaşçının iri kasları
  EN FP: a warrior's big shield
  tr FP: bir savaşçının iri kalkanı
2235 | profile (noun): the side view of a person's face | loc: profil
  EN TS: He is shown in full profile.
  tr TS: Tam profilden gösterilmiş.
  EN FS: He is shown from the back.
  tr FS: Arkadan gösterilmiş.
  EN TP: a man in full profile
  tr TP: tam profilden bir adam
  EN FP: a profile picture online
  tr FP: internette bir profil fotoğrafı
2236 | palace (noun): a large grand house where a king lives | loc: saray
  EN TS: Palace under a huge moon. Wow!
  tr TS: Dev bir ayın altında saray. Vay!
  EN FS: Palace under a huge sun. Wow!
  tr FS: Dev bir güneşin altında saray. Vay!
  EN TP: a palace in the mountains
  tr TP: dağlarda bir saray
  EN FP: a palace in the desert
  tr FP: çölde bir saray
2237 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: parlak
  EN TS: Look at this shiny yellow car!
  tr TS: Şu parlak sarı arabaya bak!
  EN FS: Look at this shiny red car!
  tr FS: Şu parlak kırmızı arabaya bak!
  EN TP: a shiny yellow car
  tr TP: parlak sarı bir araba
  EN FP: a shiny yellow bus
  tr FP: parlak sarı bir otobüs
2238 | mosque (noun): a building where Muslims go to pray | loc: cami
  EN TS: The mosque has many domes.
  tr TS: Caminin birçok kubbesi var.
  EN FS: The mosque has one dome.
  tr FS: Caminin tek kubbesi var.
  EN TP: a grand mosque with domes
  tr TP: kubbeli görkemli bir cami
  EN FP: a mosque in the desert
  tr FP: çölde bir cami
2242 | flock (noun): a group of birds together | loc: sürü
  EN TS: The flock has zero free seats.
  tr TS: Sürüde boş koltuk: sıfır.
  EN FS: The flock has many free seats.
  tr FS: Sürüde boş koltuk: bol.
  EN TP: a flock of small birds
  tr TP: küçük kuşlardan bir sürü
  EN FP: a flock of sheep
  tr FP: bir koyun sürüsü
2245 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: otlarla kaplı
  EN TS: It's just a bit overgrown.
  tr TS: Azıcık otlarla kaplı, o kadar.
  EN FS: It's just a bit snowy.
  tr FS: Azıcık karla kaplı, o kadar.
  EN TP: an overgrown cottage
  tr TP: otlarla kaplı bir kulübe
  EN FP: an overgrown lawn
  tr FP: otlarla kaplı bir çimenlik
2246 | miniature (adjective): a very small copy of something bigger | loc: minyatür
  EN TS: The display features a miniature cottage.
  tr TS: Vitrinde minyatür bir kulübe sergileniyor.
  EN FS: The display features a miniature castle.
  tr FS: Vitrinde minyatür bir şato sergileniyor.
  EN TP: a miniature night garden
  tr TP: minyatür bir gece bahçesi
  EN FP: a miniature train set
  tr FP: minyatür bir tren seti
2247 | scotland (noun): a country in the north of Great Britain | loc: İskoçya
  EN TS: Scotland has a lonely church.
  tr TS: İskoçya'da yalnız bir kilise var.
  EN FS: Scotland has a lonely castle.
  tr FS: İskoçya'da yalnız bir şato var.
  EN TP: a church in Scotland
  tr TP: İskoçya'da bir kilise
  EN FP: a castle in Scotland
  tr FP: İskoçya'da bir şato
2248 | graceful (adjective): moving in a smooth, beautiful, elegant way | loc: zarif
  EN TS: She is floating gracefully.
  tr TS: Zarifçe süzülüyor.
  EN FS: She is dancing gracefully.
  tr FS: Zarifçe dans ediyor.
  EN TP: floating gracefully in the air
  tr TP: havada zarifçe süzülmek
  EN FP: a graceful dance on stage
  tr FP: sahnede zarif bir dans
2249 | steampunk (adjective): a fantasy style of old brass machines and gears | loc: steampunk
  EN TS: A steampunk city of gears.
  tr TS: Dişlilerden bir steampunk şehir.
  EN FS: A steampunk city of glass.
  tr FS: Camdan bir steampunk şehir.
  EN TP: brass steampunk towers
  tr TP: pirinç steampunk kuleler
  EN FP: a steampunk costume party
  tr FP: steampunk kostüm partisi
2250 | gaze (verb): to look at something steadily for a long time | loc: uzun uzun bakmak
  EN TS: She is gazing at the city.
  tr TS: Şehre uzun uzun bakıyor.
  EN FS: She is gazing at the sea.
  tr FS: Denize uzun uzun bakıyor.
  EN TP: gazing at a rainy city
  tr TP: yağmurlu şehre uzun uzun bakmak
  EN FP: gazing at a starry sky
  tr FP: yıldızlı göğe uzun uzun bakmak
2251 | robe (noun): a long loose piece of clothing | loc: cübbe
  EN TS: Heaven's dress code: a white robe.
  tr TS: Cennetin kıyafet kuralı: beyaz cübbe.
  EN FS: Heaven's dress code: a black robe.
  tr FS: Cennetin kıyafet kuralı: siyah cübbe.
  EN TP: a long white robe
  tr TP: uzun beyaz bir cübbe
  EN FP: a robe with a hood
  tr FP: kapüşonlu bir cübbe
2254 | frozen (adjective): turned to ice or completely covered in ice | loc: donmuş
  EN TS: A frozen palace. Hi, Elsa!
  tr TS: Donmuş bir saray. Selam Elsa!
  EN FS: A frozen lake. Hi, Elsa!
  tr FS: Donmuş bir göl. Selam Elsa!
  EN TP: a frozen snowy palace
  tr TP: donmuş karlı bir saray
  EN FP: frozen peas in a bag
  tr FP: poşette donmuş bezelye
2256 | mechanical (adjective): made of machine parts and worked by machine | loc: mekanik
  EN TS: Her legs are fully mechanical.
  tr TS: Bacakları tamamen mekanik.
  EN FS: Her legs are fully wooden.
  tr FS: Bacakları tamamen tahta.
  EN TP: mechanical arms and legs
  tr TP: mekanik kollar ve bacaklar
  EN FP: a mechanical watch
  tr FP: mekanik bir saat
2257 | eyebrows (noun): the lines of hair above your eyes | loc: kaşlar
  EN TS: Her eyebrows are very dark.
  tr TS: Kaşları çok koyu.
  EN FS: Her eyebrows are very light.
  tr FS: Kaşları çok açık.
  EN TP: thick dark eyebrows
  tr TP: kalın koyu kaşlar
  EN FP: thin blond eyebrows
  tr FP: ince sarı kaşlar
2258 | spire (noun): a tall thin pointed top on a tower | loc: sivri kule
  EN TS: The church has a tall spire.
  tr TS: Kilisenin yüksek bir sivri kulesi var.
  EN FS: The church has a round dome.
  tr FS: Kilisenin yuvarlak bir kubbesi var.
  EN TP: a tall church spire
  tr TP: kilisenin yüksek sivri kulesi
  EN FP: a spire on a castle
  tr FP: şatoda bir sivri kule
2259 | lagoon (noun): a calm pool of sea water behind rocks | loc: lagün
  EN TS: Take me to this lagoon now!
  tr TS: Beni hemen bu lagüne götür!
  EN FS: Take me to this glacier now!
  tr FS: Beni hemen bu buzula götür!
  EN TP: a turquoise lagoon with palms
  tr TP: palmiyeli turkuaz bir lagün
  EN FP: a frozen lagoon in winter
  tr FP: kışın donmuş bir lagün
2260 | rowboat (noun): a small open boat moved with oars | loc: kayık
  EN TS: Poor rowboat, nobody wants it.
  tr TS: Zavallı kayık, kimse onu istemiyor.
  EN FS: Poor ship, nobody wants it.
  tr FS: Zavallı gemi, kimse onu istemiyor.
  EN TP: an empty wooden rowboat
  tr TP: boş, ahşap bir kayık
  EN FP: a rowboat full of people
  tr FP: insan dolu bir kayık
2262 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: bağlamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Dots and lines connect them.
  tr TS: Noktalar ve çizgiler onları bağlıyor.
  EN FS: Dots and lines divide them.
  tr FS: Noktalar ve çizgiler onları ayırıyor.
  EN TP: lines connecting two people
  tr TP: iki insanı bağlayan çizgiler
  EN FP: a cable connecting a phone
  tr FP: telefona bağlı bir kablo
2268 | tightrope (noun): a rope stretched high for acrobats to cross | loc: gergin ip
  EN TS: She is on a tightrope. No net!
  tr TS: Gergin bir ipin üstünde. Güvenlik ağı yok!
  EN FS: She is on a ladder. No net!
  tr FS: Bir merdivenin üstünde. Güvenlik ağı yok!
  EN TP: balancing on a tightrope
  tr TP: gergin ipte denge kurmak
  EN FP: a circus tightrope act
  tr FP: sirkte gergin ip gösterisi
2269 | blouse (noun): a loose light shirt worn by women | loc: bluz
  EN TS: Her blouse is loose and white.
  tr TS: Bluzu bol ve beyaz.
  EN FS: Her dress is loose and white.
  tr FS: Elbisesi bol ve beyaz.
  EN TP: a loose white blouse
  tr TP: bol beyaz bir bluz
  EN FP: a tight black blouse
  tr FP: dar siyah bir bluz
2271 | corridor (noun): a long narrow passage inside a building | loc: koridor
  EN TS: She is chilling in a corridor.
  tr TS: Bir koridorda takılıyor.
  EN FS: She is chilling in a kitchen.
  tr FS: Bir mutfakta takılıyor.
  EN TP: a spaceship corridor
  tr TP: bir uzay gemisi koridoru
  EN FP: a hospital corridor
  tr FP: bir hastane koridoru
2273 | jeans (noun): trousers made of strong blue cotton | loc: kot pantolon
  EN TS: Ripped jeans, full denim look.
  tr TS: Yırtık kot pantolon, tepeden tırnağa denim.
  EN FS: Ripped jeans, full black look.
  tr FS: Yırtık kot pantolon, tepeden tırnağa siyah.
  EN TP: heavily ripped blue jeans
  tr TP: bol yırtıklı mavi kot pantolon
  EN FP: ironing blue jeans
  tr FP: mavi kot pantolon ütülemek
2274 | lace (noun): fine cloth with open patterns of threads | loc: dantel
  EN TS: That lace collar is so fancy!
  tr TS: O dantel yaka ne kadar gösterişli!
  EN FS: That fur collar is so fancy!
  tr FS: O kürk yaka ne kadar gösterişli!
  EN TP: an ornate lace collar
  tr TP: süslü bir dantel yaka
  EN FP: tying a shoe lace
  tr FP: ayakkabı bağcığı bağlamak
2275 | outfit (noun): the set of clothes worn together | loc: kombin
  EN TS: Nice outfit, big sneakers!
  tr TS: Kombin güzel, spor ayakkabılar kocaman!
  EN FS: Nice outfit, tiny sneakers!
  tr FS: Kombin güzel, spor ayakkabılar minicik!
  EN TP: a street style outfit
  tr TP: sokak stili bir kombin
  EN FP: an outfit for a wedding
  tr FP: düğün için bir kombin
2278 | look up (phrase): to raise your eyes to see something above | loc: yukarı bakmak
  EN TS: He is looking up at the sky.
  tr TS: Yukarı, gökyüzüne bakıyor.
  EN FS: He is looking up at a plane.
  tr FS: Yukarı, bir uçağa bakıyor.
  EN TP: to look up at clouds
  tr TP: yukarı, bulutlara bakmak
  EN FP: to look up a word
  tr FP: sözlükte kelimeye bakmak
2280 | embrace (verb): to put your arms around someone | loc: sarılmak
  EN TS: He is embracing her at sunset.
  tr TS: Gün batımında ona sarılıyor.
  EN FS: He is embracing her in a car.
  tr FS: Arabada ona sarılıyor.
  EN TP: embracing on a sailing boat
  tr TP: yelkenlide sarılmak
  EN FP: embracing a new idea
  tr FP: yeni bir fikre sarılmak
2282 | sailing (noun): the sport of travelling on a boat with wind power | loc: yelkencilik
  EN TS: Sailing at sunset. So chill.
  tr TS: Gün batımında yelkencilik. Tam kafa dinlemelik.
  EN FS: Surfing at sunset. So chill.
  tr FS: Gün batımında sörf. Tam kafa dinlemelik.
  EN TP: sailing at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında yelkencilik
  EN FP: sailing in a storm
  tr FP: fırtınada yelkencilik
2284 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: saç modeli
  EN TS: Feathers? Bold hairstyle.
  tr TS: Tüyler mi? Cesur bir saç modeli.
  EN FS: Pearls? Bold hairstyle.
  tr FS: İnciler mi? Cesur bir saç modeli.
  EN TP: a hairstyle of feathers
  tr TP: tüylerden bir saç modeli
  EN FP: a short hairstyle
  tr FP: kısa bir saç modeli
2285 | sweatshirt (noun): a warm soft long-sleeved top, often oversized | loc: sweatshirt
  EN TS: Her sweatshirt is huge.
  tr TS: Sweatshirt'ü kocaman.
  EN FS: Her backpack is huge.
  tr FS: Sırt çantası kocaman.
  EN TP: a big blue sweatshirt
  tr TP: büyük mavi bir sweatshirt
  EN FP: a sweatshirt on a chair
  tr FP: sandalyede bir sweatshirt
2287 | grief (noun): deep sadness, especially after losing someone | loc: keder
  EN TS: He is sitting alone in grief.
  tr TS: Kederle tek başına oturuyor.
  EN FS: He is sitting alone in a car.
  tr FS: Arabada tek başına oturuyor.
  EN TP: grief in a dark garden
  tr TP: karanlık bir bahçede keder
  EN FP: grief at a funeral
  tr FP: cenazede keder
2288 | crop top (noun): a short top that leaves the stomach bare | loc: crop top
  EN TS: Crop top at the marina.
  tr TS: Marinada crop top.
  EN FS: Crop top at the ski resort.
  tr FS: Kayak merkezinde crop top.
  EN TP: a black crop top
  tr TP: siyah bir crop top
  EN FP: a white crop top
  tr FP: beyaz bir crop top
2291 | asteroid (noun): a rock that flies through space | loc: asteroit
  EN TS: Just a few asteroids. Relax.
  tr TS: Sadece birkaç asteroit. Rahat ol.
  EN FS: Just a few birds. Relax.
  tr FS: Sadece birkaç kuş. Rahat ol.
  EN TP: floating asteroids
  tr TP: süzülen asteroitler
  EN FP: an asteroid hitting Earth
  tr FP: Dünya'ya çarpan bir asteroit
2295 | sleeve (noun): the part of a garment that covers the arm | loc: kol
  EN TS: Those sleeves are enormous!
  tr TS: Şu elbise kolları devasa!
  EN FS: Those boots are enormous!
  tr FS: Şu çizmeler devasa!
  EN TP: wide white sleeves
  tr TP: geniş beyaz kollar
  EN FP: short black sleeves
  tr FP: kısa siyah kollar
2296 | floral (adjective): decorated with a flower pattern | loc: çiçekli
  EN TS: Her floral dress matches the wall!
  tr TS: Çiçekli elbisesi duvarla uyumlu!
  EN FS: Her striped dress matches the wall!
  tr FS: Çizgili elbisesi duvarla uyumlu!
  EN TP: an orange floral dress
  tr TP: turuncu çiçekli bir elbise
  EN FP: a floral beach shirt
  tr FP: çiçekli bir plaj gömleği
2297 | shore (noun): the land along the edge of the sea or a lake | loc: kıyı
  EN TS: Waves are hitting the shore.
  tr TS: Dalgalar kıyıya çarpıyor.
  EN FS: Waves are hitting the boat.
  tr FS: Dalgalar tekneye çarpıyor.
  EN TP: palm trees on the shore
  tr TP: kıyıda palmiyeler
  EN FP: a boat on the shore
  tr FP: kıyıda bir tekne
2300 | on fire (phrase): burning with flames | loc: alevler içinde
  EN TS: The guitar is on fire!
  tr TS: Gitar alevler içinde!
  EN FS: The piano is on fire!
  tr FS: Piyano alevler içinde!
  EN TP: a guitar on fire
  tr TP: alevler içinde bir gitar
  EN FP: a house on fire
  tr FP: alevler içinde bir ev
2301 | launch (verb): to send a rocket up into space | loc: fırlatmak
  EN TS: The shuttle is being launched.
  tr TS: Mekik fırlatılıyor.
  EN FS: The plane is being launched.
  tr FS: Uçak fırlatılıyor.
  EN TP: launching a space shuttle
  tr TP: uzay mekiği fırlatmak
  EN FP: launching a new product
  tr FP: kâğıttan uçak fırlatmak
2302 | weightless (adjective): floating freely because gravity does not pull | loc: ağırlıksız
  EN TS: He is weightless and relaxed.
  tr TS: Ağırlıksız ve rahat görünüyor.
  EN FS: He is weightless and scared.
  tr FS: Ağırlıksız ve korkmuş görünüyor.
  EN TP: a weightless astronaut
  tr TP: ağırlıksız bir astronot
  EN FP: a weightless feather
  tr FP: ağırlıksız bir tüy
2305 | rocky (adjective): covered with rocks and stones | loc: kayalık
  EN TS: A rocky road to a lighthouse.
  tr TS: Deniz fenerine giden kayalık bir yol.
  EN FS: A rocky road to a castle.
  tr FS: Şatoya giden kayalık bir yol.
  EN TP: a rocky headland
  tr TP: kayalık bir burun
  EN FP: a rocky beach with sunbeds
  tr FP: şezlonglu kayalık bir plaj
2306 | countryside (noun): land with fields and villages, away from towns | loc: kırsal
  EN TS: The countryside never ends.
  tr TS: Kırsal bölge hiç bitmiyor.
  EN FS: The city never ends.
  tr FS: Şehir hiç bitmiyor.
  EN TP: kids in the countryside
  tr TP: kırsalda çocuklar
  EN FP: kids leaving the countryside
  tr FP: kırsaldan ayrılan çocuklar
2308 | viking (noun): a warrior sailor from old Scandinavia | loc: Viking
  EN TS: The viking is holding a blade.
  tr TS: Viking bir kılıç tutuyor.
  EN FS: The viking is holding an axe.
  tr FS: Viking bir balta tutuyor.
  EN TP: a viking in fur
  tr TP: kürkler içinde bir Viking
  EN FP: a viking on a ship
  tr FP: gemide bir Viking
2310 | melody (noun): a line of musical notes that makes a tune | loc: ezgi
  EN TS: A melody rises from the piano.
  tr TS: Piyanodan bir ezgi yükseliyor.
  EN FS: A melody rises from the drum.
  tr FS: Davuldan bir ezgi yükseliyor.
  EN TP: a golden melody rising
  tr TP: yükselen altın bir ezgi
  EN FP: a golden melody falling
  tr FP: düşen altın bir ezgi
2311 | stained glass (noun): coloured glass pieces forming a picture | loc: vitray
  EN TS: The stained glass is huge.
  tr TS: Vitray kocaman.
  EN FS: The stained glass is tiny.
  tr FS: Vitray minicik.
  EN TP: tall stained glass windows
  tr TP: yüksek vitray pencereler
  EN FP: a stained glass lamp
  tr FP: vitray bir lamba
2312 | race car (noun): a very fast car built for racing on a track | loc: yarış arabası
  EN TS: A race car by the palm trees.
  tr TS: Palmiyelerin yanında bir yarış arabası.
  EN FS: A race car by the pine trees.
  tr FS: Çamların yanında bir yarış arabası.
  EN TP: a red race car
  tr TP: kırmızı bir yarış arabası
  EN FP: a red race horse
  tr FP: kırmızı bir yarış atı
2313 | camper van (noun): a van you can travel and sleep in | loc: karavan
  EN TS: Home is where the camper van is.
  tr TS: Karavan neredeyse ev oradadır.
  EN FS: Home is where the orange tent is.
  tr FS: Turuncu çadır neredeyse ev oradadır.
  EN TP: an orange camper van
  tr TP: turuncu bir karavan
  EN FP: a camper van in town
  tr FP: şehirde bir karavan
2314 | ghost (noun): the spirit of a dead person | loc: hayalet
  EN TS: The ghost's costume: one old sheet.
  tr TS: Hayaletin kostümü: tek bir eski çarşaf.
  EN FS: The ghost's costume: one old towel.
  tr FS: Hayaletin kostümü: tek bir eski havlu.
  EN TP: a white sheet ghost
  tr TP: beyaz çarşaftan bir hayalet
  EN FP: a ghost in a castle
  tr FP: şatoda bir hayalet
2315 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: manzara
  EN TS: This landscape is paper!
  tr TS: Bu manzara kâğıttan!
  EN FS: This landscape is glass!
  tr FS: Bu manzara camdan!
  EN TP: a paper landscape
  tr TP: kâğıttan bir manzara
  EN FP: a landscape photo
  tr FP: bir manzara fotoğrafı
2317 | hood (noun): the part of a coat that covers your head | loc: kapüşon
  EN TS: Her red hood is up.
  tr TS: Kırmızı kapüşonu başında.
  EN FS: Her red hood is down.
  tr FS: Kırmızı kapüşonu indirilmiş.
  EN TP: a red hood pulled up
  tr TP: başa çekilmiş kırmızı kapüşon
  EN FP: the hood of a car
  tr FP: bir arabanın kaputu
2318 | sword (noun): a long metal blade with a handle for fighting | loc: kılıç
  EN TS: She has a very long sword.
  tr TS: Çok uzun bir kılıcı var.
  EN FS: She has a very long spear.
  tr FS: Çok uzun bir mızrağı var.
  EN TP: a long curved sword
  tr TP: uzun, kıvrık bir kılıç
  EN FP: a long straight sword
  tr FP: uzun, düz bir kılıç
2322 | broken (adjective): cracked or in pieces, no longer whole | loc: kırık
  EN TS: The glass is broken!
  tr TS: Cam kırık!
  EN FS: The clock is broken!
  tr FS: Saat kırık!
  EN TP: a broken mirror portrait
  tr TP: kırık bir ayna portresi
  EN FP: a broken arm in plaster
  tr FP: alçıda kırık bir kol
2324 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: şarkı söylemek
  EN TS: He is singing like a star!
  tr TS: Bir yıldız gibi şarkı söylüyor!
  EN FS: He is dancing like a star!
  tr FS: Bir yıldız gibi dans ediyor!
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  tr TP: mikrofona şarkı söylemek
  EN FP: singing in the shower
  tr FP: duşta şarkı söylemek
2326 | prince (noun): the son of a king or queen | loc: prens
  EN TS: The prince has cool blue hair.
  tr TS: Prensin havalı mavi saçları var.
  EN FS: The prince has cool pink hair.
  tr FS: Prensin havalı pembe saçları var.
  EN TP: a prince with a crown
  tr TP: taçlı bir prens
  EN FP: a prince on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir prens
2327 | palm tree (noun): a tall tree with no branches and big top leaves | loc: palmiye
  EN TS: This car and the palm trees look so cool.
  tr TS: Bu araba ve palmiyeler çok havalı duruyor.
  EN FS: This bike and the palm trees look so cool.
  tr FS: Bu bisiklet ve palmiyeler çok havalı duruyor.
  EN TP: palm trees at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında palmiyeler
  EN FP: palm trees on an island
  tr FP: bir adada palmiyeler
2328 | throne (noun): the decorated chair of a king or queen | loc: taht
  EN TS: Such a "humble" throne!
  tr TS: Ne "mütevazı" bir taht!
  EN FS: Such a "humble" bed!
  tr FS: Ne "mütevazı" bir yatak!
  EN TP: a huge golden throne
  tr TP: kocaman altın bir taht
  EN FP: an empty golden throne
  tr FP: boş, altın bir taht
2330 | give (verb): to cause someone to have something | loc: vermek
  EN TS: She wants to give you flowers.
  tr TS: Sana çiçek vermek istiyor.
  EN FS: She wants to give you a cake.
  tr FS: Sana pasta vermek istiyor.
  EN TP: giving three yellow flowers
  tr TP: üç sarı çiçek vermek
  EN FP: giving red roses
  tr FP: kırmızı güller vermek
2333 | in love (phrase): having strong romantic feelings for someone | loc: âşık
  EN TS: They are so in love!
  tr TS: Birbirlerine çok âşıklar!
  EN FS: They are so angry!
  tr FS: Birbirlerine çok kızgınlar!
  EN TP: in love under autumn leaves
  tr TP: sonbahar yaprakları altında âşık
  EN FP: in love on a beach
  tr FP: kumsalda âşık
2340 | strange (adjective): unusual and hard to understand | loc: tuhaf
  EN TS: This house is a bit strange.
  tr TS: Bu ev biraz tuhaf.
  EN FS: This car is a bit strange.
  tr FS: Bu araba biraz tuhaf.
  EN TP: a strange tall house
  tr TP: tuhaf, uzun bir ev
  EN FP: a strange old boat
  tr FP: tuhaf, eski bir tekne
2341 | death (noun): the end of a living thing's life | loc: ölüm
  EN TS: Flowers make death look pretty.
  tr TS: Çiçekler ölümü güzel gösteriyor.
  EN FS: Candles make death look pretty.
  tr FS: Mumlar ölümü güzel gösteriyor.
  EN TP: death among flowers
  tr TP: çiçekler arasında ölüm
  EN FP: death in a car crash
  tr FP: trafik kazasında ölüm
2344 | crooked (adjective): bent and leaning, not straight | loc: eğri
  EN TS: The houses are a bit crooked.
  tr TS: Evler biraz eğri.
  EN FS: The trees are a bit crooked.
  tr FS: Ağaçlar biraz eğri.
  EN TP: tall crooked houses
  tr TP: uzun, eğri evler
  EN FP: a crooked picture frame
  tr FP: eğri bir resim çerçevesi
2345 | wizard (noun): a man in stories who can do magic | loc: büyücü
  EN TS: What a long wizard beard!
  tr TS: Ne uzun bir büyücü sakalı!
  EN FS: What a short wizard beard!
  tr FS: Ne kısa bir büyücü sakalı!
  EN TP: an old wizard in grey
  tr TP: griler içinde yaşlı bir büyücü
  EN FP: an old wizard in red
  tr FP: kırmızılar içinde yaşlı bir büyücü
2347 | explore (verb): to travel through a new place to see it | loc: keşfetmek
  EN TS: He is exploring an exoplanet.
  tr TS: Bir ötegezegeni keşfediyor.
  EN FS: He is exploring a deep cave.
  tr FS: Derin bir mağarayı keşfediyor.
  EN TP: exploring an alien world
  tr TP: yabancı bir dünyayı keşfetmek
  EN FP: exploring an old castle
  tr FP: eski bir şatoyu keşfetmek
2349 | dress up (phrase): to put on a costume to look like someone else | loc: kostüm giymek
  EN TS: Even the cat dressed up!
  tr TS: Kedi bile kostüm giymiş!
  EN FS: Even the dog dressed up!
  tr FS: Köpek bile kostüm giymiş!
  EN TP: dressed up as witches
  tr TP: cadı kostümü giymiş
  EN FP: dressed up as pirates
  tr FP: korsan kostümü giymiş
2350 | carve (verb): to cut a shape into something hard | loc: oymak
  EN TS: Somebody carved faces! Wow!
  tr TS: Biri yüzler oymuş! Vay!
  EN FS: Somebody carved names! Wow!
  tr FS: Biri isimler oymuş! Vay!
  EN TP: carved pumpkin faces
  tr TP: oyulmuş balkabağı yüzleri
  EN FP: carved wooden faces
  tr FP: oyulmuş tahta yüzler
2351 | drive (verb): to operate or control a vehicle | loc: araba sürmek
  EN TS: Someone is driving a green car.
  tr TS: Biri yeşil bir araba sürüyor.
  EN FS: Someone is driving a yellow car.
  tr FS: Biri sarı bir araba sürüyor.
  EN TP: to drive through autumn
  tr TP: sonbahar yollarında araba sürmek
  EN FP: to drive through the snow
  tr FP: karda araba sürmek
2353 | giant (adjective): far bigger than normal for its kind | loc: devasa
  EN TS: The mushrooms are giant, bro.
  tr TS: Mantarlar devasa, kanka.
  EN FS: The mushrooms are tiny, bro.
  tr FS: Mantarlar minicik, kanka.
  EN TP: giant pink mushrooms
  tr TP: devasa pembe mantarlar
  EN FP: giant pink flowers
  tr FP: devasa pembe çiçekler
2354 | headdress (noun): a decorated head covering for ceremonies | loc: tören başlığı
  EN TS: A huge golden headdress!
  tr TS: Kocaman altın bir tören başlığı!
  EN FS: A huge silver headdress!
  tr FS: Kocaman gümüş bir tören başlığı!
  EN TP: a huge golden headdress
  tr TP: kocaman altın tören başlığı
  EN FP: taking off a headdress
  tr FP: tören başlığını çıkarmak
2356 | toward (preposition): in the direction of something | loc: -e doğru
  EN TS: The road leads toward a planet.
  tr TS: Yol bir gezegene doğru uzanıyor.
  EN FS: The road leads toward a castle.
  tr FS: Yol bir şatoya doğru uzanıyor.
  EN TP: toward a huge planet
  tr TP: dev bir gezegene doğru
  EN FP: toward a huge city
  tr FP: dev bir şehre doğru
2357 | black and white (phrase): with no colors, only dark and light shades | loc: siyah beyaz
  EN TS: The house is black and white.
  tr TS: Ev siyah beyaz.
  EN FS: The house is red and white.
  tr FS: Ev kırmızı beyaz.
  EN TP: a black and white drawing
  tr TP: siyah beyaz bir çizim
  EN FP: a black and white film
  tr FP: siyah beyaz bir film
2358 | farm (noun): land where people grow food and keep animals | loc: çiftlik
  EN TS: The farm has red roofs.
  tr TS: Çiftliğin kırmızı çatıları var.
  EN FS: The farm has blue roofs.
  tr FS: Çiftliğin mavi çatıları var.
  EN TP: a farm on a hillside
  tr TP: yamaçta bir çiftlik
  EN FP: a farm with cows
  tr FP: inekli bir çiftlik
2359 | traditional (adjective): done or worn as it was long ago | loc: geleneksel
  EN TS: They wear traditional dress.
  tr TS: Geleneksel kıyafetler giyiyorlar.
  EN FS: They wear modern dress.
  tr FS: Modern kıyafetler giyiyorlar.
  EN TP: traditional Indian dress
  tr TP: geleneksel Hint kıyafeti
  EN FP: a traditional wedding cake
  tr FP: geleneksel bir düğün pastası
2360 | fast (adjective): moving or able to move very quickly | loc: hızlı
  EN TS: That red car looks crazy fast.
  tr TS: O kırmızı araba aşırı hızlı duruyor.
  EN FS: That red van looks crazy fast.
  tr FS: O kırmızı minibüs aşırı hızlı duruyor.
  EN TP: a fast red car
  tr TP: hızlı kırmızı bir araba
  EN FP: a fast red boat
  tr FP: hızlı kırmızı bir tekne
2363 | mysterious (adjective): strange and hard to explain | loc: gizemli
  EN TS: She's turning into mysterious smoke.
  tr TS: Gizemli bir dumana dönüşüyor.
  EN FS: She's turning into mysterious water.
  tr FS: Gizemli bir suya dönüşüyor.
  EN TP: a mysterious smoky woman
  tr TP: dumandan gizemli bir kadın
  EN FP: a mysterious locked door
  tr FP: kilitli, gizemli bir kapı
2364 | bull (noun): a large male animal of the cow family | loc: boğa
  EN TS: A white bull is behind him.
  tr TS: Arkasında beyaz bir boğa var.
  EN FS: A white horse is behind him.
  tr FS: Arkasında beyaz bir at var.
  EN TP: a bull with curved horns
  tr TP: kıvrık boynuzlu bir boğa
  EN FP: a bull in a ring
  tr FP: arenada bir boğa
2365 | metal (noun): a hard shiny material like iron or steel | loc: metal
  EN TS: His metal suit is so shiny.
  tr TS: Metal kıyafeti pırıl pırıl.
  EN FS: His metal suit is so dirty.
  tr FS: Metal kıyafeti kapkara kirli.
  EN TP: a red metal suit
  tr TP: kırmızı metal bir kıyafet
  EN FP: a red metal car
  tr FP: kırmızı metal bir araba
2367 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: kirli
  EN TS: This car is a little dirty.
  tr TS: Bu araba azıcık kirli.
  EN FS: This bus is a little dirty.
  tr FS: Bu otobüs azıcık kirli.
  EN TP: an old dirty sports car
  tr TP: eski, kirli bir spor araba
  EN FP: a dirty old bus
  tr FP: kirli, eski bir otobüs
2368 | paradise (noun): a perfect place where all is wonderful | loc: cennet
  EN TS: This beach is total paradise.
  tr TS: Bu plaj tam bir cennet.
  EN FS: This desert is total paradise.
  tr FS: Bu çöl tam bir cennet.
  EN TP: a tropical paradise at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında tropikal bir cennet
  EN FP: a paradise for skiers
  tr FP: kayakçılar için bir cennet
2371 | sorrow (noun): deep sadness, especially about a loss | loc: keder
  EN TS: The angel is lost in sorrow.
  tr TS: Melek kedere gömülmüş.
  EN FS: The angel is lost in a book.
  tr FS: Melek kitaba gömülmüş.
  EN TP: an angel full of sorrow
  tr TP: kederle dolu bir melek
  EN FP: an angel full of joy
  tr FP: neşeyle dolu bir melek
2372 | exhausted (adjective): extremely tired with no energy left | loc: bitkin
  EN TS: He looks totally exhausted.
  tr TS: Tamamen bitkin görünüyor.
  EN FS: He looks totally excited.
  tr FS: Tamamen heyecanlı görünüyor.
  EN TP: an exhausted worker
  tr TP: bitkin bir işçi
  EN FP: an exhausted phone battery
  tr FP: şarjı bitmiş bir telefon
2373 | universe (noun): all of space with its stars and planets | loc: evren
  EN TS: The universe looks crowded.
  tr TS: Evren kalabalık görünüyor.
  EN FS: The universe looks empty.
  tr FS: Evren bomboş görünüyor.
  EN TP: a universe full of planets
  tr TP: gezegenlerle dolu bir evren
  EN FP: a universe without stars
  tr FP: yıldızsız bir evren
2375 | half (noun): one of two equal parts of something | loc: yarım | translator note: 'yarım' does not fit 'half X, half Y'; sentence uses 'yarısı', phrases keep 'yarım'
  EN TS: Half grey, half yellow. It cannot decide.
  tr TS: Yarısı gri, yarısı sarı. Karar veremiyor.
  EN FS: Half grey, half green. It cannot decide.
  tr FS: Yarısı gri, yarısı yeşil. Karar veremiyor.
  EN TP: half a yellow car
  tr TP: yarım bir sarı araba
  EN FP: half a yellow bus
  tr FP: yarım bir sarı otobüs
2378 | relax (verb): to calm down and let your body feel loose | loc: rahatlamak
  EN TS: She is totally relaxing now.
  tr TS: Şu an resmen rahatlıyor.
  EN FS: She is totally running now.
  tr FS: Şu an resmen koşuyor.
  EN TP: relaxing under the moon
  tr TP: ayın altında rahatlamak
  EN FP: relaxing on the beach
  tr FP: kumsalda rahatlamak
2379 | fall (verb): to descend freely under gravity | loc: düşmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Red leaves are falling.
  tr TS: Kırmızı yapraklar düşüyor.
  EN FS: Red apples are falling.
  tr FS: Kırmızı elmalar düşüyor.
  EN TP: leaves falling in the rain
  tr TP: yağmurda düşen yapraklar
  EN FP: snow falling on cars
  tr FP: arabalara düşen kar
2380 | escape (verb): to get away from danger | loc: kaçmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The car is escaping the fire!
  tr TS: Araba yangından kaçıyor!
  EN FS: The car is escaping the flood!
  tr FS: Araba selden kaçıyor!
  EN TP: escaping a burning forest
  tr TP: yanan bir ormandan kaçmak
  EN FP: escaping a burning house
  tr FP: yanan bir evden kaçmak
2381 | claws (noun): the sharp curved nails on an animal's feet | loc: pençeler
  EN TS: Those claws are really sharp!
  tr TS: O pençeler gerçekten keskin!
  EN FS: Those teeth are really sharp!
  tr FS: O dişler gerçekten keskin!
  EN TP: claws on a branch
  tr TP: dalda pençeler
  EN FP: claws on a cat
  tr FP: bir kedinin pençeleri
2382 | scales (noun): the hard shiny plates on a fish's skin | loc: pullar
  EN TS: Look, her tail has blue scales.
  tr TS: Bak, kuyruğunda mavi pullar var.
  EN FS: Look, her tail has pink scales.
  tr FS: Bak, kuyruğunda pembe pullar var.
  EN TP: a tail with blue scales
  tr TP: mavi pullu bir kuyruk
  EN FP: weighing on the scales
  tr FP: terazide tartılmak
2383 | gem (noun): a beautiful precious stone used in jewellery | loc: mücevher taşı
  EN TS: Fire and gems everywhere!
  tr TS: Her yerde ateş ve mücevher taşları!
  EN FS: Ice and gems everywhere!
  tr FS: Her yerde buz ve mücevher taşları!
  EN TP: sparkling colorful gems
  tr TP: ışıldayan renkli mücevher taşları
  EN FP: gems in a dark cave
  tr FP: karanlık mağarada mücevher taşları
2384 | kingdom (noun): a land that a king or queen rules | loc: krallık
  EN TS: A tiny kingdom on a hill.
  tr TS: Tepede minicik bir krallık.
  EN FS: A tiny kingdom on an island.
  tr FS: Adada minicik bir krallık.
  EN TP: a storybook kingdom
  tr TP: masallardan çıkmış bir krallık
  EN FP: the animal kingdom
  tr FP: hayvanlar âlemi
2385 | alien (adjective): coming from another planet, not from Earth | loc: uzaylı
  EN TS: A purple alien landscape.
  tr TS: Mor, uzaylı bir manzara.
  EN FS: A green alien landscape.
  tr FS: Yeşil, uzaylı bir manzara.
  EN TP: a purple alien world
  tr TP: mor bir uzaylı dünyası
  EN FP: an alien in a spaceship
  tr FP: uzay gemisinde bir uzaylı
2386 | railing (noun): a fence of bars you hold onto | loc: korkuluk
  EN TS: The railing faces the sunset.
  tr TS: Korkuluk gün batımına bakıyor.
  EN FS: The railing faces a mountain.
  tr FS: Korkuluk bir dağa bakıyor.
  EN TP: a metal balcony railing
  tr TP: metal bir balkon korkuluğu
  EN FP: a railing on a staircase
  tr FP: merdivende bir korkuluk
2387 | twisted (adjective): bent and turned in many directions | loc: bükülmüş
  EN TS: The tree is twisted. Cool.
  tr TS: Ağaç bükülmüş. Havalı.
  EN FS: The tree is straight. Cool.
  tr FS: Ağaç dümdüz. Havalı.
  EN TP: a twisted old tree
  tr TP: bükülmüş yaşlı bir ağaç
  EN FP: a twisted metal fence
  tr FP: bükülmüş metal bir çit
2388 | gamer (noun): a person who plays video games a lot | loc: oyuncu
  EN TS: This gamer loves pink.
  tr TS: Bu oyuncu pembeye bayılıyor.
  EN FS: This gamer loves green.
  tr FS: Bu oyuncu yeşile bayılıyor.
  EN TP: a gamer in pink
  tr TP: pembeler içinde bir oyuncu
  EN FP: a gamer in blue
  tr FP: maviler içinde bir oyuncu
2389 | faith (noun): a strong belief in God or a religion | loc: inanç | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is praying with faith.
  tr TS: İnançla dua ediyor.
  EN FS: She is praying with open arms.
  tr FS: Kollarını açarak dua ediyor.
  EN TP: praying with deep faith
  tr TP: derin bir inançla dua etmek
  EN FP: losing her faith
  tr FP: inancını kaybetmek
2390 | stylish (adjective): dressed in a fashionable, attractive way | loc: şık
  EN TS: So stylish on a beach!
  tr TS: Kumsalda bu kadar şık olunur mu!
  EN FS: So stylish on a ship!
  tr FS: Gemide bu kadar şık olunur mu!
  EN TP: a stylish beach look
  tr TP: şık bir plaj stili
  EN FP: a stylish winter coat
  tr FP: şık bir kışlık mont
2391 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: manzara
  EN TS: Epic scenery, red sky.
  tr TS: Efsane manzara, kızıl gökyüzü.
  EN FS: Epic scenery, blue sky.
  tr FS: Efsane manzara, mavi gökyüzü.
  EN TP: scenery with a huge moon
  tr TP: kocaman aylı bir manzara
  EN FP: scenery for a school play
  tr FP: okul oyunu için bir dekor
2392 | stroll (noun): a slow, relaxed walk for pleasure | loc: gezinti
  EN TS: A stroll in a straw hat? Stylish.
  tr TS: Hasır şapkayla bir gezinti mi? Şık.
  EN FS: A stroll in a red hat? Stylish.
  tr FS: Kırmızı şapkayla bir gezinti mi? Şık.
  EN TP: a stroll among flowers
  tr TP: çiçekler arasında bir gezinti
  EN FP: a stroll on the beach
  tr FP: kumsalda bir gezinti
2393 | high heels (noun): shoes with a tall thin part under the back | loc: yüksek topuklu ayakkabı
  EN TS: Office look with high heels.
  tr TS: Yüksek topuklu ayakkabılarla ofis stili.
  EN FS: Office look with trainers.
  tr FS: Spor ayakkabılarla ofis stili.
  EN TP: black strappy high heels
  tr TP: bantlı siyah yüksek topuklu ayakkabılar
  EN FP: high heels in a box
  tr FP: kutuda yüksek topuklu ayakkabılar
2394 | choose (verb): to pick one thing from several choices | loc: seçmek
  EN TS: He has to choose a road.
  tr TS: Bir yol seçmek zorunda.
  EN FS: He has to choose a boat.
  tr FS: Bir tekne seçmek zorunda.
  EN TP: choosing the right road
  tr TP: doğru yolu seçmek
  EN FP: choosing the right dress
  tr FP: doğru elbiseyi seçmek
2395 | vest (noun): clothing without sleeves worn over a shirt | loc: yelek
  EN TS: His vest has gold buttons.
  tr TS: Yeleğinin altın düğmeleri var.
  EN FS: His vest has silver buttons.
  tr FS: Yeleğinin gümüş düğmeleri var.
  EN TP: a black leather vest
  tr TP: siyah deri bir yelek
  EN FP: a vest under a jacket
  tr FP: ceketin altında bir yelek
2396 | corset (noun): a tight laced top that shapes the waist | loc: korse
  EN TS: That laced corset is stunning.
  tr TS: O bağcıklı korse büyüleyici.
  EN FS: That laced glove is stunning.
  tr FS: O bağcıklı eldiven büyüleyici.
  EN TP: a laced corset
  tr TP: bağcıklı bir korse
  EN FP: laced boots
  tr FP: bağcıklı botlar
2397 | gloomy (adjective): dark and sad, without light or cheer | loc: kasvetli
  EN TS: This room is so gloomy!
  tr TS: Bu oda çok kasvetli!
  EN FS: This room is so sunny!
  tr FS: Bu oda çok güneşli!
  EN TP: a gloomy gothic room
  tr TP: kasvetli gotik bir oda
  EN FP: a gloomy rainy day
  tr FP: kasvetli, yağmurlu bir gün
2398 | terrace (noun): an open paved area outside a building | loc: teras
  EN TS: The terrace offers sea views.
  tr TS: Teras deniz manzarası sunuyor.
  EN FS: The terrace offers city views.
  tr FS: Teras şehir manzarası sunuyor.
  EN TP: a tiled seaside terrace
  tr TP: deniz kenarında karo döşeli teras
  EN FP: a terrace in the mountains
  tr FP: dağlarda bir teras
2400 | fierce (adjective): violent, angry and frightening to look at | loc: vahşi
  EN TS: That's one fierce viking!
  tr TS: İşte vahşi bir Viking!
  EN FS: That's one fierce pirate!
  tr FS: İşte vahşi bir korsan!
  EN TP: a fierce angry stare
  tr TP: vahşi, öfkeli bir bakış
  EN FP: a fierce storm at sea
  tr FP: denizde vahşi bir fırtına
2401 | fantasy (noun): an imagined magical world, not real life | loc: fantezi
  EN TS: A path into a fantasy world.
  tr TS: Fantezi bir dünyaya giden yol.
  EN FS: A path into a busy city.
  tr FS: Kalabalık bir şehre giden yol.
  EN TP: a fantasy forest path
  tr TP: fantezi bir orman yolu
  EN FP: a fantasy book cover
  tr FP: fantezi bir kitap kapağı
2404 | lotus (noun): a large white water flower with many petals | loc: lotus
  EN TS: This lotus has an orange centre.
  tr TS: Bu lotusun ortası turuncu.
  EN FS: This lotus has a purple centre.
  tr FS: Bu lotusun ortası mor.
  EN TP: a white lotus flower
  tr TP: beyaz bir lotus çiçeği
  EN FP: a lotus yoga pose
  tr FP: lotus yoga pozu
2406 | jeep (noun): a strong car for driving on rough roads | loc: cip
  EN TS: One jeep, too many bags!
  tr TS: Bir cip, bir sürü çanta!
  EN FS: One bike, too many bags!
  tr FS: Bir bisiklet, bir sürü çanta!
  EN TP: a jeep full of bags
  tr TP: çantalarla dolu bir cip
  EN FP: a jeep in the city
  tr FP: şehirde bir cip
2408 | imagination (noun): the mind's power to create unreal worlds | loc: hayal gücü
  EN TS: Imagination opens a real path.
  tr TS: Hayal gücü gerçek bir yol açıyor.
  EN FS: Imagination opens a real door.
  tr FS: Hayal gücü gerçek bir kapı açıyor.
  EN TP: a book of imagination
  tr TP: bir hayal gücü kitabı
  EN FP: no imagination at all
  tr FP: sıfır hayal gücü
2411 | ornate (adjective): covered in rich, detailed patterns | loc: süslü
  EN TS: That crown is so ornate!
  tr TS: O taç ne kadar süslü!
  EN FS: That mask is so ornate!
  tr FS: O maske ne kadar süslü!
  EN TP: an ornate golden crown
  tr TP: süslü altın bir taç
  EN FP: an ornate wooden door
  tr FP: süslü ahşap bir kapı
2412 | arm in arm (phrase): walking with your arm linked through another's | loc: kol kola
  EN TS: They are walking arm in arm.
  tr TS: Kol kola yürüyorlar.
  EN FS: They are running arm in arm.
  tr FS: Kol kola koşuyorlar.
  EN TP: walking arm in arm
  tr TP: kol kola yürümek
  EN FP: sitting arm in arm
  tr FP: kol kola oturmak
2413 | cub (noun): the baby of a wild animal like a wolf | loc: yavru
  EN TS: She is hugging a wolf cub!
  tr TS: Bir kurt yavrusuna sarılıyor!
  EN FS: She is hugging a bear cub!
  tr FS: Bir ayı yavrusuna sarılıyor!
  EN TP: hugging a wolf cub
  tr TP: bir kurt yavrusuna sarılmak
  EN FP: hugging a big wolf
  tr FP: kocaman bir kurda sarılmak
2415 | garland (noun): a chain of flowers worn or hung as decoration | loc: çelenk
  EN TS: The god wears flower garlands.
  tr TS: Tanrı çiçek çelenkleri takıyor.
  EN FS: The god wears paper garlands.
  tr FS: Tanrı kâğıt çelenkler takıyor.
  EN TP: garlands of red flowers
  tr TP: kırmızı çiçeklerden çelenkler
  EN FP: garlands on a Christmas tree
  tr FP: Noel ağacında çelenkler
2417 | harmony (noun): a state where opposites fit together calmly | loc: uyum
  EN TS: Dark and light in harmony.
  tr TS: Karanlık ve aydınlık uyum içinde.
  EN FS: Red and blue in harmony.
  tr FS: Kırmızı ve mavi uyum içinde.
  EN TP: a sphere of harmony
  tr TP: bir uyum küresi
  EN FP: singing in harmony
  tr FP: uyum içinde şarkı söylemek
2418 | songbird (noun): a small bird known for its singing | loc: ötücü kuş
  EN TS: I think it's a songbird.
  tr TS: Bence bu bir ötücü kuş.
  EN FS: I think it's a pigeon.
  tr FS: Bence bu bir güvercin.
  EN TP: a songbird on a branch
  tr TP: dalda bir ötücü kuş
  EN FP: a songbird on a roof
  tr FP: çatıda bir ötücü kuş
2420 | rickety (adjective): old, weak and likely to fall apart | loc: köhne
  EN TS: This rickety tower is "safe".
  tr TS: Bu köhne kule "güvenli".
  EN FS: This rickety bridge is "safe".
  tr FS: Bu köhne köprü "güvenli".
  EN TP: a rickety tower of houses
  tr TP: evlerden köhne bir kule
  EN FP: a rickety old chair
  tr FP: köhne, eski bir sandalye
2421 | fungus (noun): a mushroom-like thing that grows in damp places | loc: mantar
  EN TS: This fungus is big. Really big.
  tr TS: Bu mantar büyük. Hem de çok büyük.
  EN FS: This fungus is small. Really small.
  tr FS: Bu mantar küçük. Hem de çok küçük.
  EN TP: giant pale fungus
  tr TP: dev, soluk bir mantar
  EN FP: fungus on old bread
  tr FP: bayat ekmekte küf mantarı
2422 | overalls (noun): trousers with straps over the shoulders | loc: tulum
  EN TS: She is reading in overalls.
  tr TS: Tulumla kitap okuyor.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in overalls.
  tr FS: Tulumla uyuyor.
  EN TP: blue denim overalls
  tr TP: mavi kot tulum
  EN FP: overalls covered in paint
  tr FP: boyaya bulanmış tulum
2424 | cypress (noun): a tall narrow dark-green tree | loc: servi
  EN TS: Cypresses grow on the left.
  tr TS: Serviler sol tarafta yükseliyor.
  EN FS: Cypresses grow on the right.
  tr FS: Serviler sağ tarafta yükseliyor.
  EN TP: a row of cypress trees
  tr TP: bir sıra servi ağacı
  EN FP: a cypress in a pot
  tr FP: saksıda bir servi
2425 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: çerçeve
  EN TS: A black cat in a spooky frame!
  tr TS: Ürkütücü bir çerçevede kara bir kedi!
  EN FS: A white cat in a spooky frame!
  tr FS: Ürkütücü bir çerçevede beyaz bir kedi!
  EN TP: a frame with black roses
  tr TP: siyah güllü bir çerçeve
  EN FP: a frame for a bicycle
  tr FP: bir bisiklet kadrosu
2428 | monitor (noun): the screen you look at on a computer | loc: monitör
  EN TS: Three monitors, maximum focus.
  tr TS: Üç monitör, maksimum odak.
  EN FS: Two monitors, maximum focus.
  tr FS: İki monitör, maksimum odak.
  EN TP: three large monitors
  tr TP: üç büyük monitör
  EN FP: a baby monitor
  tr FP: bir bebek monitörü
2429 | stag (noun): an adult male deer with large antlers | loc: erkek geyik
  EN TS: Yo, the stag is in a stream.
  tr TS: Kanka, erkek geyik derede.
  EN FS: Yo, the stag is in a field.
  tr FS: Kanka, erkek geyik tarlada.
  EN TP: a stag in a stream
  tr TP: derede bir erkek geyik
  EN FP: a stag in the snow
  tr FP: karda bir erkek geyik
2430 | flow (verb): to move along smoothly like water | loc: akmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The river flows past rocks.
  tr TS: Nehir kayaların yanından akıyor.
  EN FS: The river flows past houses.
  tr FS: Nehir evlerin yanından akıyor.
  EN TP: a river flowing through rocks
  tr TP: kayaların arasından akan bir nehir
  EN FP: a river flowing through town
  tr FP: kasabanın içinden akan bir nehir
2432 | flamenco (noun): a fiery Spanish dance with fans and stamping | loc: flamenko
  EN TS: Her flamenco pose is fire!
  tr TS: Flamenko pozu ateş gibi!
  EN FS: Her ballet pose is fire!
  tr FS: Bale pozu ateş gibi!
  EN TP: flamenco with a fan
  tr TP: yelpazeyle flamenko
  EN FP: flamenco on a stage
  tr FP: sahnede flamenko
2433 | gallop (verb): how a horse runs at its fastest speed | loc: dörtnala koşmak
  EN TS: The horse is galloping at us!
  tr TS: At dörtnala üstümüze koşuyor!
  EN FS: The donkey is galloping at us!
  tr FS: Eşek dörtnala üstümüze koşuyor!
  EN TP: a galloping white horse
  tr TP: dörtnala koşan beyaz bir at
  EN FP: a galloping black horse
  tr FP: dörtnala koşan siyah bir at
2434 | still life (noun): a painting of arranged objects like flowers | loc: natürmort
  EN TS: The still life shows blossoms.
  tr TS: Natürmort çiçekleri gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The still life shows oranges.
  tr FS: Natürmort portakalları gösteriyor.
  EN TP: a still life with blossoms
  tr TP: çiçekli bir natürmort
  EN FP: a still life with fruit
  tr FP: meyveli bir natürmort
2435 | pebble (noun): a small smooth round stone | loc: çakıl taşı
  EN TS: The stream is full of pebbles.
  tr TS: Dere çakıl taşlarıyla dolu.
  EN FS: The stream is full of fish.
  tr FS: Dere balıklarla dolu.
  EN TP: smooth round pebbles
  tr TP: pürüzsüz, yuvarlak çakıl taşları
  EN FP: pebbles on a beach
  tr FP: kumsalda çakıl taşları
2439 | wet (adjective): covered or soaked with water | loc: ıslak
  EN TS: The street is wet at night.
  tr TS: Gece sokak ıslak.
  EN FS: The street is dry at night.
  tr FS: Gece sokak kuru.
  EN TP: a wet night street
  tr TP: ıslak bir gece sokağı
  EN FP: a wet sandy beach
  tr FP: ıslak, kumlu bir plaj
2440 | electricity (noun): the energy made by moving electrons | loc: elektrik
  EN TS: The electricity is everywhere!
  tr TS: Elektrik her yerde!
  EN FS: The water is everywhere!
  tr FS: Su her yerde!
  EN TP: sparks of electricity
  tr TP: elektrik kıvılcımları
  EN FP: an electricity bill
  tr FP: bir elektrik faturası
2446 | shoelaces (noun): strings that tie your shoes or boots closed | loc: ayakkabı bağcıkları
  EN TS: Big bows, long shoelaces!
  tr TS: Kocaman fiyonklar, uzun ayakkabı bağcıkları!
  EN FS: Big bows, short shoelaces!
  tr FS: Kocaman fiyonklar, kısa ayakkabı bağcıkları!
  EN TP: long yellow shoelaces
  tr TP: uzun sarı ayakkabı bağcıkları
  EN FP: broken yellow shoelaces
  tr FP: kopmuş sarı ayakkabı bağcıkları
2449 | shop window (noun): a big glass front where a store shows its goods | loc: vitrin
  EN TS: Just a "few" glowing shop windows.
  tr TS: Sadece "birkaç" ışıl ışıl vitrin.
  EN FS: Just a "few" dark shop windows.
  tr FS: Sadece "birkaç" karanlık vitrin.
  EN TP: glowing shop windows
  tr TP: ışıl ışıl vitrinler
  EN FP: a broken shop window
  tr FP: kırık bir vitrin
2450 | thunderstorm (noun): a storm with lightning and loud rumbling | loc: gök gürültülü fırtına
  EN TS: A thunderstorm over the water.
  tr TS: Suyun üstünde gök gürültülü fırtına.
  EN FS: A thunderstorm over the city.
  tr FS: Şehrin üstünde gök gürültülü fırtına.
  EN TP: a thunderstorm over water
  tr TP: su üstünde gök gürültülü fırtına
  EN FP: a thunderstorm over a town
  tr FP: kasaba üstünde gök gürültülü fırtına
2451 | eiffel tower (noun): the famous tall iron landmark in Paris | loc: Eyfel Kulesi
  EN TS: A bird near the Eiffel Tower.
  tr TS: Eyfel Kulesi'nin yanında bir kuş.
  EN FS: A plane near the Eiffel Tower.
  tr FS: Eyfel Kulesi'nin yanında bir uçak.
  EN TP: the riverside Eiffel Tower
  tr TP: nehir kıyısındaki Eyfel Kulesi
  EN FP: the Eiffel Tower in snow
  tr FP: karlar altında Eyfel Kulesi
2452 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: romantik
  EN TS: The snowy walk is romantic!
  tr TS: Karlı yürüyüş çok romantik!
  EN FS: The rainy walk is romantic!
  tr FS: Yağmurlu yürüyüş çok romantik!
  EN TP: a romantic snowy walk
  tr TP: romantik, karlı bir yürüyüş
  EN FP: a romantic candle dinner
  tr FP: romantik bir akşam yemeği
2454 | winding (adjective): curving and turning again and again | loc: dolambaçlı
  EN TS: The winding path has lanterns.
  tr TS: Dolambaçlı yolda fenerler var.
  EN FS: The straight path has lamps.
  tr FS: Düz yolda lambalar var.
  EN TP: a winding cobblestone path
  tr TP: dolambaçlı, taş döşeli bir yol
  EN FP: a winding mountain river
  tr FP: dolambaçlı bir dağ nehri
2455 | shorts (noun): trousers that end above the knee | loc: şort
  EN TS: She wears green shorts.
  tr TS: Yeşil bir şort giyiyor.
  EN FS: She wears green trousers.
  tr FS: Yeşil bir pantolon giyiyor.
  EN TP: green denim shorts
  tr TP: yeşil kot şort
  EN FP: green swimming shorts
  tr FP: yeşil deniz şortu
2457 | nurse (noun): a person who cares for sick people in a hospital | loc: hemşire
  EN TS: The nurse has a stethoscope.
  tr TS: Hemşirenin stetoskopu var.
  EN FS: The nurse has a clipboard.
  tr FS: Hemşirenin not panosu var.
  EN TP: a nurse in uniform
  tr TP: üniformalı bir hemşire
  EN FP: a nurse with a baby
  tr FP: bebekli bir hemşire
2458 | farmhouse (noun): the main house on a farm, where the farmer lives | loc: çiftlik evi
  EN TS: A farmhouse with lit windows.
  tr TS: Pencereleri ışıklı bir çiftlik evi.
  EN FS: A farmhouse with dark windows.
  tr FS: Pencereleri karanlık bir çiftlik evi.
  EN TP: a farmhouse at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında bir çiftlik evi
  EN FP: a farmhouse by the sea
  tr FP: deniz kenarında bir çiftlik evi
2460 | wildflowers (noun): flowers that grow by themselves in fields | loc: kır çiçekleri
  EN TS: Wildflowers in a blue pot, cute.
  tr TS: Mavi saksıda kır çiçekleri, tatlış.
  EN FS: Wildflowers in a red pot, cute.
  tr FS: Kırmızı saksıda kır çiçekleri, tatlış.
  EN TP: a pot of wildflowers
  tr TP: bir saksı kır çiçeği
  EN FP: a field of wildflowers
  tr FP: bir tarla dolusu kır çiçeği
2462 | starry (adjective): full of stars, said about a night sky | loc: yıldızlı
  EN TS: The starry sky has a moon.
  tr TS: Yıldızlı gökyüzünde bir ay var.
  EN FS: The starry sky has a rainbow.
  tr FS: Yıldızlı gökyüzünde bir gökkuşağı var.
  EN TP: a starry night sky
  tr TP: yıldızlı bir gece göğü
  EN FP: a starry city night
  tr FP: yıldızlı bir şehir gecesi
2463 | peony (noun): a big round flower with soft ruffled petals | loc: şakayık
  EN TS: The valley features pink peonies.
  tr TS: Vadide pembe şakayıklar öne çıkıyor.
  EN FS: The valley features pink tulips.
  tr FS: Vadide pembe laleler öne çıkıyor.
  EN TP: pink peonies on a hill
  tr TP: tepede pembe şakayıklar
  EN FP: peonies in a vase
  tr FP: vazoda şakayıklar
2464 | symmetrical (adjective): the same on both sides, like a mirror | loc: simetrik
  EN TS: The patterns are symmetrical.
  tr TS: Desenler simetrik.
  EN FS: The patterns are colourful.
  tr FS: Desenler rengârenk.
  EN TP: symmetrical leaf patterns
  tr TP: simetrik yaprak desenleri
  EN FP: a symmetrical building
  tr FP: simetrik bir bina
2465 | float (verb): to stay up in the air without falling | loc: havada süzülmek
  EN TS: She is floating. No big deal.
  tr TS: Havada süzülüyor. Ne var bunda?
  EN FS: She is swimming. No big deal.
  tr FS: Yüzüyor. Ne var bunda?
  EN TP: floating in a blue sky
  tr TP: masmavi gökte süzülmek
  EN FP: floating in a pool
  tr FP: havuzda süzülmek
2466 | crystal (noun): a clear hard stone with flat shiny faces | loc: kristal
  EN TS: Her dress is made of crystals.
  tr TS: Elbisesi kristallerden yapılmış.
  EN FS: Her dress is made of feathers.
  tr FS: Elbisesi tüylerden yapılmış.
  EN TP: a dress of glowing crystals
  tr TP: parlayan kristallerden bir elbise
  EN FP: a crystal glass of water
  tr FP: kristal bir bardak su
2470 | saxophone (noun): a curved metal wind instrument used in jazz | loc: saksofon
  EN TS: The saxophone has a curved bell.
  tr TS: Saksofonun ağzı kıvrık.
  EN FS: The saxophone has a straight bell.
  tr FS: Saksofonun ağzı düz.
  EN TP: a floating saxophone
  tr TP: havada süzülen bir saksofon
  EN FP: a saxophone player
  tr FP: bir saksofoncu
2471 | bookworm (noun): a person who reads all the time | loc: kitap kurdu
  EN TS: She is such a bookworm.
  tr TS: Tam bir kitap kurdu.
  EN FS: She is such a gamer.
  tr FS: Tam bir oyun bağımlısı.
  EN TP: a bookworm with a book
  tr TP: elinde kitapla bir kitap kurdu
  EN FP: a bookworm with a phone
  tr FP: elinde telefonla bir kitap kurdu
2472 | uniform (noun): clothing a group wears to be identified | loc: üniforma
  EN TS: Her uniform looks really neat.
  tr TS: Üniforması çok derli toplu duruyor.
  EN FS: Her coat looks really neat.
  tr FS: Montu çok derli toplu duruyor.
  EN TP: a school uniform
  tr TP: bir okul üniforması
  EN FP: a police uniform
  tr FP: bir polis üniforması
2473 | wreath (noun): a ring of leaves hung up as decoration | loc: çelenk
  EN TS: The wreath is on a red door.
  tr TS: Çelenk kırmızı bir kapıda.
  EN FS: The wreath is on a blue door.
  tr FS: Çelenk mavi bir kapıda.
  EN TP: a wreath on the door
  tr TP: kapıda bir çelenk
  EN FP: a wreath on her head
  tr FP: başında bir çelenk
2474 | foam (noun): the mass of small white bubbles on waves | loc: köpük
  EN TS: Wild foam on a stormy sea.
  tr TS: Fırtınalı denizde çılgın köpükler.
  EN FS: Wild foam on a calm sea.
  tr FS: Sakin denizde çılgın köpükler.
  EN TP: foam on stormy waves
  tr TP: fırtınalı dalgalarda köpük
  EN FP: coffee with milk foam
  tr FP: süt köpüklü kahve
2475 | barefoot (adjective): wearing nothing on your feet | loc: çıplak ayaklı
  EN TS: She is reading barefoot.
  tr TS: Çıplak ayaklı kız kitap okuyor.
  EN FS: She is dancing barefoot.
  tr FS: Çıplak ayaklı kız dans ediyor.
  EN TP: barefoot on a daybed
  tr TP: divanda çıplak ayaklı bir kız
  EN FP: barefoot on the beach
  tr FP: kumsalda çıplak ayaklı bir kız
2477 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: dağınık
  EN TS: The wind made his hair messy.
  tr TS: Rüzgâr yüzünden saçları dağınık.
  EN FS: The rain made his hair messy.
  tr FS: Yağmur yüzünden saçları dağınık.
  EN TP: messy brown hair
  tr TP: dağınık kahverengi saçlar
  EN FP: a messy bedroom
  tr FP: dağınık bir yatak odası
2478 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: doktor
  EN TS: The doctor is smiling at us.
  tr TS: Doktor bize gülümsüyor.
  EN FS: The doctor is shouting at us.
  tr FS: Doktor bize bağırıyor.
  EN TP: a smiling cartoon doctor
  tr TP: gülümseyen çizgi film doktoru
  EN FP: a doctor in surgery
  tr FP: ameliyatta bir doktor
2480 | present (noun): a gift you give someone | loc: hediye
  EN TS: The car has too many presents!
  tr TS: Arabada çok fazla hediye var!
  EN FS: The car has too many dogs!
  tr FS: Arabada çok fazla köpek var!
  EN TP: presents on a car roof
  tr TP: araba tavanında hediyeler
  EN FP: presents under a tree
  tr FP: ağacın altında hediyeler
2481 | globe (noun): a small round model of the Earth on a stand | loc: küre
  EN TS: He is holding a globe.
  tr TS: Elinde bir küre tutuyor.
  EN FS: He is holding a ball.
  tr FS: Elinde bir top tutuyor.
  EN TP: holding a globe
  tr TP: bir küre tutmak
  EN FP: a snow globe
  tr FP: bir kar küresi
2482 | turret (noun): a small round tower on a big building | loc: küçük kule
  EN TS: So many turrets on one castle!
  tr TS: Bir şatoda bu kadar çok küçük kule!
  EN FS: So many flags on one castle!
  tr FS: Bir şatoda bu kadar çok bayrak!
  EN TP: pointed castle turrets
  tr TP: sivri küçük şato kuleleri
  EN FP: a tank turret
  tr FP: bir tank kulesi
2483 | dried (adjective): with all the water taken out to keep it | loc: kurutulmuş
  EN TS: Dried flowers lie in the book.
  tr TS: Kitabın içinde kurutulmuş çiçekler var.
  EN FS: Fresh flowers lie in the book.
  tr FS: Kitabın içinde taze çiçekler var.
  EN TP: dried flowers in a book
  tr TP: kitapta kurutulmuş çiçekler
  EN FP: dried fruit in a bowl
  tr FP: kasede kurutulmuş meyveler
2484 | steeple (noun): the tall pointed tower of a church | loc: çan kulesi
  EN TS: The church has a tall steeple.
  tr TS: Kilisenin yüksek bir çan kulesi var.
  EN FS: The castle has a tall steeple.
  tr FS: Şatonun yüksek bir çan kulesi var.
  EN TP: a church steeple in snow
  tr TP: karda bir kilise çan kulesi
  EN FP: a steeple in a city
  tr FP: şehirde bir çan kulesi
2485 | sinister (adjective): looking evil, as if something bad will happen | loc: uğursuz
  EN TS: The crow man looks sinister.
  tr TS: Karga adam uğursuz görünüyor.
  EN FS: The cat man looks sinister.
  tr FS: Kedi adam uğursuz görünüyor.
  EN TP: a sinister crow-headed figure
  tr TP: karga başlı uğursuz bir figür
  EN FP: a sinister black cat
  tr FP: uğursuz bir kara kedi
2486 | hieroglyphs (noun): the picture symbols of ancient Egyptian writing | loc: hiyeroglifler
  EN TS: Hieroglyphs cover the wall.
  tr TS: Hiyeroglifler duvarı kaplıyor.
  EN FS: Flowers cover the wall.
  tr FS: Çiçekler duvarı kaplıyor.
  EN TP: a wall of hieroglyphs
  tr TP: hiyerogliflerle dolu bir duvar
  EN FP: hieroglyphs in a textbook
  tr FP: ders kitabında hiyeroglifler
2490 | snowman (noun): a winter figure made of big white frozen balls | loc: kardan adam
  EN TS: Nice hat! Is the snowman cold?
  tr TS: Güzel şapka! Kardan adam üşüyor mu?
  EN FS: Nice hat! Is the dog cold?
  tr FS: Güzel şapka! Köpek üşüyor mu?
  EN TP: a snowman in a hat
  tr TP: şapkalı bir kardan adam
  EN FP: building a snowman
  tr FP: kardan adam yapmak
2492 | busy (adjective): full of people and activity | loc: kalabalık
  EN TS: The village is so busy!
  tr TS: Köy çok kalabalık!
  EN FS: The village is so quiet!
  tr FS: Köy çok sessiz!
  EN TP: a busy snowy village
  tr TP: kalabalık, karlı bir köy
  EN FP: a busy summer beach
  tr FP: kalabalık bir yaz plajı
2493 | quilt (noun): a warm cover sewn from many pieces of cloth | loc: yorgan
  EN TS: The farm is sewn as a quilt.
  tr TS: Çiftlik bir yorgan gibi dikilmiş.
  EN FS: The farm is sewn as a flag.
  tr FS: Çiftlik bir bayrak gibi dikilmiş.
  EN TP: a quilt of a farm
  tr TP: çiftlik desenli bir yorgan
  EN FP: a quilt on a bed
  tr FP: yatakta bir yorgan
2494 | victorian (adjective): in the style of 19th-century England | loc: Viktorya dönemine ait
  EN TS: Victorian street. Is that Sherlock?
  tr TS: Viktorya dönemine ait bir sokak. Bu Sherlock mu?
  EN FS: Modern street. Is that Sherlock?
  tr FS: Modern bir sokak. Bu Sherlock mu?
  EN TP: a snowy Victorian street
  tr TP: karlı, Viktorya dönemine ait bir sokak
  EN FP: a Victorian tea party
  tr FP: Viktorya dönemi çay partisi
2495 | sparrow (noun): a small brown bird you see everywhere | loc: serçe
  EN TS: I counted two sparrows.
  tr TS: İki serçe saydım.
  EN FS: I counted four sparrows.
  tr FS: Dört serçe saydım.
  EN TP: two sparrows on a branch
  tr TP: dalda iki serçe
  EN FP: two sparrows in the snow
  tr FP: karda iki serçe
2497 | santa claus (noun): the jolly man in red who brings Christmas presents | loc: Noel Baba
  EN TS: Santa Claus is taking a break.
  tr TS: Noel Baba mola veriyor.
  EN FS: Santa Claus is taking a bath.
  tr FS: Noel Baba banyo yapıyor.
  EN TP: Santa Claus with presents
  tr TP: hediyeleriyle Noel Baba
  EN FP: Santa Claus with reindeer
  tr FP: ren geyikleriyle Noel Baba
2498 | tender (adjective): gentle and full of love | loc: şefkatli
  EN TS: They share a tender hug.
  tr TS: Aralarında şefkatli bir sarılma var.
  EN FS: They share a tender kiss.
  tr FS: Aralarında şefkatli bir öpücük var.
  EN TP: a tender embrace
  tr TP: şefkatli bir kucaklaşma
  EN FP: a tender steak
  tr FP: yumuşacık bir biftek
2499 | teddy bear (noun): a soft cuddly toy animal for children | loc: oyuncak ayı
  EN TS: Two teddy bears are cuddling.
  tr TS: İki oyuncak ayı sarmaş dolaş.
  EN FS: Two teddy bears are fighting.
  tr FS: İki oyuncak ayı kavga ediyor.
  EN TP: teddy bears in the snow
  tr TP: karda oyuncak ayılar
  EN FP: teddy bears on a bed
  tr FP: yatakta oyuncak ayılar
2500 | laptop (noun): a small computer you can carry and fold shut | loc: dizüstü bilgisayar
  EN TS: He is typing on a laptop.
  tr TS: Dizüstü bilgisayarda yazı yazıyor.
  EN FS: He is typing on a phone.
  tr FS: Telefonda yazı yazıyor.
  EN TP: typing on a laptop
  tr TP: dizüstü bilgisayarda yazmak
  EN FP: carrying a laptop
  tr FP: dizüstü bilgisayar taşımak
2501 | shiva (noun): the Hindu god with blue skin and a trident | loc: Şiva
  EN TS: Shiva is meditating on a rock.
  tr TS: Şiva bir kayanın üstünde meditasyon yapıyor.
  EN FS: Shiva is meditating in a boat.
  tr FS: Şiva bir teknede meditasyon yapıyor.
  EN TP: Shiva with a trident
  tr TP: üç dişli mızraklı Şiva
  EN FP: Shiva with a sword
  tr FP: kılıçlı Şiva
2502 | shrine (noun): a small holy place built to honour someone | loc: kutsal mekân
  EN TS: A forest shrine full of moss.
  tr TS: Ormanda yosunlarla kaplı kutsal bir mekân.
  EN FS: A desert shrine full of sand.
  tr FS: Çölde kumlarla kaplı kutsal bir mekân.
  EN TP: a mossy forest shrine
  tr TP: ormanda yosunlu kutsal mekân
  EN FP: a shrine in a city
  tr FP: şehirde kutsal bir mekân
2504 | krishna (noun): a Hindu god shown with blue skin | loc: Krişna
  EN TS: Krishna has a peacock feather.
  tr TS: Krişna'nın tavus kuşu tüyü var.
  EN FS: Krishna has an eagle feather.
  tr FS: Krişna'nın kartal tüyü var.
  EN TP: Krishna with a crown
  tr TP: taçlı Krişna
  EN FP: Krishna with a flute
  tr FP: flütlü Krişna
2505 | rifle (noun): a long gun you hold with two hands | loc: tüfek
  EN TS: Rain, a rifle and zero complaints.
  tr TS: Yağmur, bir tüfek ve sıfır şikâyet.
  EN FS: Sun, a rifle and zero complaints.
  tr FS: Güneş, bir tüfek ve sıfır şikâyet.
  EN TP: a long scoped rifle
  tr TP: uzun, dürbünlü bir tüfek
  EN FP: a rifle on the ground
  tr FP: yerde bir tüfek
2506 | geometric (adjective): made of simple regular shapes like squares | loc: geometrik
  EN TS: Everything here is geometric.
  tr TS: Burada her şey geometrik.
  EN FS: Everything here is blue.
  tr FS: Burada her şey mavi.
  EN TP: pink geometric shapes
  tr TP: pembe geometrik şekiller
  EN FP: a geometric maths test
  tr FP: bir geometri sınavı
2509 | lavender (noun): a purple plant with a famous sweet smell | loc: lavanta
  EN TS: A path runs through lavender.
  tr TS: Lavantaların arasından bir yol geçiyor.
  EN FS: A path runs through wheat.
  tr FS: Buğdayların arasından bir yol geçiyor.
  EN TP: rows of purple lavender
  tr TP: sıra sıra mor lavantalar
  EN FP: a bottle of lavender oil
  tr FP: bir şişe lavanta yağı
2510 | bedtime (noun): the time when you go to sleep | loc: uyku vakti
  EN TS: Bedtime for a boy and a cat!
  tr TS: Bir oğlan ve bir kedi için uyku vakti!
  EN FS: Bedtime for a boy and a dog!
  tr FS: Bir oğlan ve bir köpek için uyku vakti!
  EN TP: bedtime under a blanket
  tr TP: battaniye altında uyku vakti
  EN FP: bedtime story with a book
  tr FP: uyku vakti kitap okumak
2511 | spark (noun): a tiny glowing bit of fire in the air | loc: kıvılcım
  EN TS: Sparks are flying around them.
  tr TS: Etraflarında kıvılcımlar uçuşuyor.
  EN FS: Leaves are flying around them.
  tr FS: Etraflarında yapraklar uçuşuyor.
  EN TP: sparks around a couple
  tr TP: bir çiftin etrafında kıvılcımlar
  EN FP: a spark from a plug
  tr FP: prizden çıkan bir kıvılcım
2512 | coloring book (noun): a set of outline pictures for kids to paint in | loc: boyama kitabı
  EN TS: This coloring book needs you.
  tr TS: Bu boyama kitabı seni bekliyor.
  EN FS: This photo book needs you.
  tr FS: Bu fotoğraf albümü seni bekliyor.
  EN TP: a coloring book page
  tr TP: bir boyama kitabı sayfası
  EN FP: a coloring book cover
  tr FP: bir boyama kitabı kapağı
2514 | herbs (noun): leafy plants used in cooking, tea or medicine | loc: otlar
  EN TS: She's adding herbs to a bowl.
  tr TS: Kaseye otlar ekliyor.
  EN FS: She's adding salt to a bowl.
  tr FS: Kaseye tuz ekliyor.
  EN TP: sprinkling dried herbs
  tr TP: kurutulmuş otlar serpmek
  EN FP: chopping fresh herbs
  tr FP: taze otlar doğramak
2516 | year (noun): a period of twelve months | loc: yıl
  EN TS: The year is 2024.
  tr TS: Yıl 2024.
  EN FS: The year is 2025.
  tr FS: Yıl 2025.
  EN TP: the year 2024 glowing
  tr TP: parlayan 2024 yılı
  EN FP: the year 2025
  tr FP: 2025 yılı
2519 | backyard (noun): the private grassy area behind a house | loc: arka bahçe
  EN TS: Did you see this backyard? A flamingo!
  tr TS: Bu arka bahçeyi gördün mü? Flamingo var!
  EN FS: Did you see this backyard? A swing!
  tr FS: Bu arka bahçeyi gördün mü? Salıncak var!
  EN TP: a busy little backyard
  tr TP: hareketli, küçük bir arka bahçe
  EN FP: a backyard vegetable patch
  tr FP: arka bahçede sebze tarhı
2520 | sacred (adjective): holy and connected to religion | loc: kutsal
  EN TS: A sacred light from above!
  tr TS: Yukarıdan kutsal bir ışık!
  EN FS: A sacred light from below!
  tr FS: Aşağıdan kutsal bir ışık!
  EN TP: a sacred beam of light
  tr TP: kutsal bir ışık huzmesi
  EN FP: a sacred river
  tr FP: kutsal bir nehir
2522 | clover (noun): a small plant with round leaves, a lucky sign | loc: yonca
  EN TS: The clovers have four leaves.
  tr TS: Yoncaların dört yaprağı var.
  EN FS: The clovers have three leaves.
  tr FS: Yoncaların üç yaprağı var.
  EN TP: four-leaf clovers
  tr TP: dört yapraklı yoncalar
  EN FP: a clover field with cows
  tr FP: inekli bir yonca tarlası
2523 | snowfall (noun): snow coming down from the sky | loc: kar yağışı
  EN TS: The snowfall is heavy tonight.
  tr TS: Bu gece kar yağışı çok yoğun.
  EN FS: The rainfall is heavy tonight.
  tr FS: Bu gece yağmur yağışı çok yoğun.
  EN TP: heavy snowfall over a village
  tr TP: köyün üstünde yoğun kar yağışı
  EN FP: light snowfall in a city
  tr FP: şehirde hafif kar yağışı
2524 | walking stick (noun): a stick you lean on to help you walk | loc: baston
  EN TS: He has a walking stick.
  tr TS: Elinde bir baston var.
  EN FS: He has a big umbrella.
  tr FS: Elinde kocaman bir şemsiye var.
  EN TP: leaning on a walking stick
  tr TP: bastona yaslanmak
  EN FP: a walking stick for hiking
  tr FP: doğa yürüyüşü için baston
2525 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: kaldırmak
  EN TS: Mum is lifting her baby bear.
  tr TS: Anne, yavru ayısını kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: Mum is lifting her baby fox.
  tr FS: Anne, yavru tilkisini kaldırıyor.
  EN TP: to lift the cub up
  tr TP: yavruyu yukarı kaldırmak
  EN FP: to lift a heavy box
  tr FP: ağır bir kutu kaldırmak
2526 | poseidon (noun): the ancient Greek god of the sea | loc: Poseidon
  EN TS: Poseidon has two spears.
  tr TS: Poseidon'un iki mızrağı var.
  EN FS: Poseidon has two swords.
  tr FS: Poseidon'un iki kılıcı var.
  EN TP: Poseidon rising from waves
  tr TP: dalgalardan yükselen Poseidon
  EN FP: Poseidon sinking a ship
  tr FP: gemi batıran Poseidon
2527 | gas mask (noun): a mask that protects your face from dangerous air | loc: gaz maskesi
  EN TS: The DJ wears a gas mask. Why?
  tr TS: DJ gaz maskesi takıyor. Neden?
  EN FS: The DJ wears a ski mask. Why?
  tr FS: DJ kar maskesi takıyor. Neden?
  EN TP: gas mask and headphones
  tr TP: gaz maskesi ve kulaklık
  EN FP: gas mask and goggles
  tr FP: gaz maskesi ve koruyucu gözlük
2528 | top hat (noun): a tall formal hat with a flat top | loc: silindir şapka
  EN TS: A purple top hat? Bold choice.
  tr TS: Mor silindir şapka mı? Cesur tercih.
  EN FS: A black top hat? Bold choice.
  tr FS: Siyah silindir şapka mı? Cesur tercih.
  EN TP: a shiny purple top hat
  tr TP: parlak mor bir silindir şapka
  EN FP: a magician's top hat
  tr FP: sihirbazın silindir şapkası
2529 | gentle (adjective): kind, calm and soft in the way you act | loc: nazik
  EN TS: He has a gentle face.
  tr TS: Nazik bir yüzü var.
  EN FS: He has a gentle dog.
  tr FS: Nazik bir köpeği var.
  EN TP: a gentle calm face
  tr TP: nazik, sakin bir yüz
  EN FP: a gentle calm sea
  tr FP: sakin, dingin bir deniz
2530 | candlelight (noun): the warm light of a burning candle | loc: mum ışığı
  EN TS: Candlelight glows among roses.
  tr TS: Güllerin arasında mum ışığı parlıyor.
  EN FS: Candlelight glows among books.
  tr FS: Kitapların arasında mum ışığı parlıyor.
  EN TP: candlelight in a lantern
  tr TP: fenerde mum ışığı
  EN FP: candlelight on a cake
  tr FP: pastada mum ışığı
2531 | sparkle (verb): to shine with many small flashing points | loc: parıldamak
  EN TS: Even the sky sparkles for them.
  tr TS: Gökyüzü bile onlar için parıldıyor.
  EN FS: Even the sea sparkles for them.
  tr FS: Deniz bile onlar için parıldıyor.
  EN TP: a sparkling night sky
  tr TP: parıldayan bir gece göğü
  EN FP: sparkling water in a glass
  tr FP: bardakta parıldayan su
2532 | ruffle (noun): a strip of frilly fabric used as trim | loc: fırfır
  EN TS: Her dress has grey ruffles.
  tr TS: Elbisesinin gri fırfırları var.
  EN FS: Her dress has red ruffles.
  tr FS: Elbisesinin kırmızı fırfırları var.
  EN TP: a dress with grey ruffles
  tr TP: gri fırfırlı bir elbise
  EN FP: ruffles on a red hat
  tr FP: kırmızı bir şapkada fırfırlar
2533 | misty (adjective): covered in thin fog that hides things | loc: sisli
  EN TS: The far end is misty.
  tr TS: Uzak taraf sisli.
  EN FS: The far end is sunny.
  tr FS: Uzak taraf güneşli.
  EN TP: a misty old street
  tr TP: sisli, eski bir sokak
  EN FP: a misty mountain lake
  tr FP: sisli bir dağ gölü
2536 | chimpanzee (noun): a large clever African ape with dark hair | loc: şempanze
  EN TS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious biker.
  tr TS: Bu şempanze ciddi bir motorcuya benziyor.
  EN FS: This chimpanzee looks like a serious surfer.
  tr FS: Bu şempanze ciddi bir sörfçüye benziyor.
  EN TP: a chimpanzee on a motorbike
  tr TP: motosiklette bir şempanze
  EN FP: a chimpanzee in a tree
  tr FP: ağaçta bir şempanze
2537 | bedtime story (noun): a story read to children before sleep | loc: uyku masalı
  EN TS: The girl is reading a bedtime story.
  tr TS: Kız bir uyku masalı okuyor.
  EN FS: The boy is reading a bedtime story.
  tr FS: Oğlan bir uyku masalı okuyor.
  EN TP: a bedtime story in bed
  tr TP: yatakta bir uyku masalı
  EN FP: a bedtime story on TV
  tr FP: televizyonda bir uyku masalı
2538 | little red riding hood (noun): the fairy-tale girl in a red hooded cloak | loc: Kırmızı Başlıklı Kız
  EN TS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the wolf.
  tr TS: Kırmızı Başlıklı Kız kurda güveniyor.
  EN FS: Little Red Riding Hood trusts the bear.
  tr FS: Kırmızı Başlıklı Kız ayıya güveniyor.
  EN TP: Little Red Riding Hood's wolf
  tr TP: Kırmızı Başlıklı Kız'ın kurdu
  EN FP: Little Red Riding Hood's gran
  tr FP: Kırmızı Başlıklı Kız'ın ninesi
2539 | artificial intelligence (noun): computer systems that think and learn | loc: yapay zekâ
  EN TS: Artificial intelligence lives in her head.
  tr TS: Yapay zekâ onun kafasında yaşıyor.
  EN FS: Artificial intelligence lives in her car.
  tr FS: Yapay zekâ onun arabasında yaşıyor.
  EN TP: artificial intelligence robot
  tr TP: yapay zekâlı bir robot
  EN FP: artificial intelligence app
  tr FP: bir yapay zekâ uygulaması
2540 | dungeon (noun): a dark prison under a castle | loc: zindan
  EN TS: What a "cosy" dungeon.
  tr TS: Ne "rahat" bir zindan.
  EN FS: What a "cosy" garden.
  tr FS: Ne "rahat" bir bahçe.
  EN TP: a dark dungeon with candles
  tr TP: mumlu, karanlık bir zindan
  EN FP: a dark cellar with wine
  tr FP: şaraplı, karanlık bir mahzen
2541 | staircase (noun): a set of stairs inside a building | loc: merdiven
  EN TS: Nobody cleaned this staircase.
  tr TS: Bu merdiveni kimse temizlememiş.
  EN FS: Nobody cleaned this kitchen.
  tr FS: Bu mutfağı kimse temizlememiş.
  EN TP: a crumbling stone staircase
  tr TP: dökülen taş bir merdiven
  EN FP: a crumbling stone bridge
  tr FP: dökülen taş bir köprü
2543 | tusk (noun): one of the two long teeth of an elephant | loc: fildişi
  EN TS: The elephant has long tusks.
  tr TS: Filin uzun fildişleri var.
  EN FS: The elephant has short tusks.
  tr FS: Filin kısa fildişleri var.
  EN TP: two long white tusks
  tr TP: iki uzun beyaz fildişi
  EN FP: a walrus with tusks
  tr FP: uzun dişli bir mors
2544 | hanuman (noun): the Hindu monkey god with a crown and mace | loc: Hanuman
  EN TS: Hanuman has a golden crown.
  tr TS: Hanuman'ın altın bir tacı var.
  EN FS: Hanuman has a silver crown.
  tr FS: Hanuman'ın gümüş bir tacı var.
  EN TP: Hanuman with a golden staff
  tr TP: altın asalı Hanuman
  EN FP: Hanuman with a sword
  tr FP: kılıçlı Hanuman
2545 | worship (verb): to show deep love and respect to a god | loc: tapmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The monkey is worshipping.
  tr TS: Maymun tapınıyor.
  EN FS: The monkey is sleeping.
  tr FS: Maymun uyuyor.
  EN TP: worshipping on stone steps
  tr TP: taş basamaklarda tapınmak
  EN FP: worshipping a football star
  tr FP: bir futbol yıldızına tapmak
2546 | spacious (adjective): having a lot of open room inside | loc: ferah
  EN TS: This hall is "quite" spacious.
  tr TS: Bu salon "epey" ferah.
  EN FS: This hall is "quite" tiny.
  tr FS: Bu salon "epey" minicik.
  EN TP: a spacious hall
  tr TP: ferah bir salon
  EN FP: a spacious car
  tr FP: ferah bir araba
2547 | toadstool (noun): a mushroom with a red cap and white spots | loc: sinek mantarı
  EN TS: These toadstools are massive!
  tr TS: Bu sinek mantarları devasa!
  EN FS: These toadstools are tiny!
  tr FS: Bu sinek mantarları minicik!
  EN TP: giant red toadstools
  tr TP: dev kırmızı sinek mantarları
  EN FP: toadstools in a basket
  tr FP: sepette sinek mantarları
2548 | barrel (noun): a big round wooden container | loc: fıçı
  EN TS: So many barrels. Beer, maybe?
  tr TS: Bir sürü fıçı. Bira mı acaba?
  EN FS: So many bikes. Beer, maybe?
  tr FS: Bir sürü bisiklet. Bira mı acaba?
  EN TP: stacked wooden barrels
  tr TP: üst üste ahşap fıçılar
  EN FP: a barrel of cold beer
  tr FP: bir fıçı soğuk bira
2549 | father (noun): a male parent | loc: baba
  EN TS: Father and son are cheering!
  tr TS: Baba oğul tezahürat yapıyor!
  EN FS: Father and son are crying!
  tr FS: Baba oğul ağlıyor!
  EN TP: a father carrying his son
  tr TP: oğlunu taşıyan bir baba
  EN FP: a father carrying shopping
  tr FP: alışveriş torbası taşıyan baba
2550 | cross-legged (adverb): sitting with your legs bent and crossed | loc: bağdaş kurarak
  EN TS: She sits cross-legged, barefoot.
  tr TS: Yalın ayak, bağdaş kurarak oturuyor.
  EN FS: She sits cross-legged in boots.
  tr FS: Botlarıyla bağdaş kurarak oturuyor.
  EN TP: sitting cross-legged
  tr TP: bağdaş kurarak oturmak
  EN FP: standing cross-legged
  tr FP: bağdaş kurarak ayakta durmak
2551 | miami (noun): the Florida beach city of neon and palms | loc: Miami
  EN TS: Miami vibes: palms and neon.
  tr TS: Miami havası: palmiyeler ve neon.
  EN FS: Miami vibes: snow and neon.
  tr FS: Miami havası: kar ve neon.
  EN TP: a neon Miami street
  tr TP: neon ışıklı bir Miami sokağı
  EN FP: a Miami beach at noon
  tr FP: öğlen vakti Miami plajı
2552 | virtual reality (noun): a computer world seen through special goggles | loc: sanal gerçeklik
  EN TS: She is in virtual reality.
  tr TS: Sanal gerçekliğin içinde.
  EN FS: She is in a swimming pool.
  tr FS: Bir yüzme havuzunun içinde.
  EN TP: a virtual reality headset
  tr TP: bir sanal gerçeklik gözlüğü
  EN FP: virtual reality at school
  tr FP: okulda sanal gerçeklik
2556 | brain (noun): the organ in the head we think with | loc: beyin
  EN TS: Fact: the brain is glowing.
  tr TS: Bilgi: beyin parlıyor.
  EN FS: Fact: the heart is glowing.
  tr FS: Bilgi: kalp parlıyor.
  EN TP: a glowing brain
  tr TP: parlayan bir beyin
  EN FP: a brain in a jar
  tr FP: kavanozda bir beyin
2557 | sailboat (noun): a small boat pushed along by the wind | loc: yelkenli
  EN TS: Wait, the sailboat is glass?
  tr TS: Dur, yelkenli camdan mı?
  EN FS: Wait, the sailboat is wood?
  tr FS: Dur, yelkenli tahtadan mı?
  EN TP: a glass sailboat
  tr TP: camdan bir yelkenli
  EN FP: a sailboat in a bottle
  tr FP: şişede bir yelkenli
2558 | freedom (noun): the feeling of being free and held by nothing | loc: özgürlük
  EN TS: She is flying. Pure freedom!
  tr TS: Uçuyor. Saf özgürlük!
  EN FS: She is swimming. Pure freedom!
  tr FS: Yüzüyor. Saf özgürlük!
  EN TP: freedom above the sea
  tr TP: denizin üstünde özgürlük
  EN FP: freedom under the sea
  tr FP: denizin altında özgürlük
2559 | coin (noun): a flat metal piece used as money | loc: madenî para
  EN TS: This tree grows coins!
  tr TS: Bu ağaçta madenî para yetişiyor!
  EN FS: This tree grows apples!
  tr FS: Bu ağaçta elma yetişiyor!
  EN TP: coins falling from a tree
  tr TP: ağaçtan düşen madenî paralar
  EN FP: coins in a piggy bank
  tr FP: kumbarada madenî paralar
2560 | miracle (noun): an amazing event that cannot be explained | loc: mucize
  EN TS: Walking on water? A miracle!
  tr TS: Su üstünde yürümek mi? Mucize!
  EN FS: Walking on fire? A miracle!
  tr FS: Ateş üstünde yürümek mi? Mucize!
  EN TP: a miracle on the ocean
  tr TP: okyanusta bir mucize
  EN FP: a miracle cure for colds
  tr FP: soğuk algınlığına mucize ilaç
2562 | detective (noun): a person whose job is to solve crimes | loc: dedektif
  EN TS: Rainy night, lonely detective.
  tr TS: Yağmurlu gece, yalnız dedektif.
  EN FS: Sunny day, lonely detective.
  tr FS: Güneşli gün, yalnız dedektif.
  EN TP: a detective in the rain
  tr TP: yağmurda bir dedektif
  EN FP: a crime scene detective
  tr FP: olay yerinde bir dedektif
2563 | merchant (noun): a person who buys and sells goods | loc: tüccar
  EN TS: A merchant is checking grain.
  tr TS: Bir tüccar tahılı kontrol ediyor.
  EN FS: A merchant is checking coins.
  tr FS: Bir tüccar paraları kontrol ediyor.
  EN TP: a merchant by candlelight
  tr TP: mum ışığında bir tüccar
  EN FP: a merchant at the market
  tr FP: pazarda bir tüccar
2564 | hydrangea (noun): a garden plant with round clusters of flowers | loc: ortanca
  EN TS: This hydrangea cluster is blue.
  tr TS: Bu ortanca salkımı mavi.
  EN FS: This hydrangea cluster is pink.
  tr FS: Bu ortanca salkımı pembe.
  EN TP: a blue hydrangea cluster
  tr TP: mavi bir ortanca salkımı
  EN FP: a hydrangea in a vase
  tr FP: vazoda bir ortanca
2567 | saint (noun): a very holy person honoured in religion | loc: aziz | translator note: veil suggests a female saint: TS/FS use 'azize' (contains 'aziz')
  EN TS: The saint wears a white veil.
  tr TS: Azizenin başında beyaz bir örtü var.
  EN FS: The saint wears a red veil.
  tr FS: Azizenin başında kırmızı bir örtü var.
  EN TP: a saint with a halo
  tr TP: haleli bir aziz
  EN FP: a saint on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir aziz
2571 | grumpy (adjective): in a bad mood and easily annoyed | loc: huysuz
  EN TS: The boy is grumpy. Again.
  tr TS: Oğlan huysuz. Yine.
  EN FS: The girl is grumpy. Again.
  tr FS: Kız huysuz. Yine.
  EN TP: a grumpy little boy
  tr TP: huysuz küçük bir oğlan
  EN FP: a grumpy old man
  tr FP: huysuz yaşlı bir adam
2572 | triangle (noun): a flat shape with three straight sides | loc: üçgen
  EN TS: The triangles are glowing.
  tr TS: Üçgenler parlıyor.
  EN FS: The circles are glowing.
  tr FS: Daireler parlıyor.
  EN TP: glowing neon triangles
  tr TP: parlayan neon üçgenler
  EN FP: a triangle road sign
  tr FP: üçgen bir trafik levhası
2575 | anonymous (adjective): with the name and face kept hidden | loc: anonim
  EN TS: The DJ is totally anonymous.
  tr TS: DJ tamamen anonim.
  EN FS: The chef is totally anonymous.
  tr FS: Şef tamamen anonim.
  EN TP: an anonymous hooded DJ
  tr TP: kapüşonlu anonim bir DJ
  EN FP: an anonymous letter
  tr FP: anonim bir mektup
2576 | heartbroken (adjective): extremely sad after losing someone you love | loc: kalbi kırık
  EN TS: He is heartbroken in Paris.
  tr TS: Paris'te kalbi kırık.
  EN FS: He is heartbroken in Rome.
  tr FS: Roma'da kalbi kırık.
  EN TP: heartbroken in the rain
  tr TP: yağmurda kalbi kırık
  EN FP: heartbroken in the snow
  tr FP: karda kalbi kırık
2578 | visor (noun): the clear front part of a helmet | loc: vizör
  EN TS: The visor is like a mirror.
  tr TS: Vizör ayna gibi.
  EN FS: The visor is like a window.
  tr FS: Vizör pencere gibi.
  EN TP: a mirrored helmet visor
  tr TP: aynalı bir kask vizörü
  EN FP: a cap with a visor
  tr FP: vizörlü bir kep
2579 | weird (adjective): strange and not normal | loc: tuhaf
  EN TS: Her glasses are super weird.
  tr TS: Gözlükleri aşırı tuhaf.
  EN FS: Her hat is super weird.
  tr FS: Şapkası aşırı tuhaf.
  EN TP: a weird retro machine
  tr TP: tuhaf, retro bir makine
  EN FP: a weird old car
  tr FP: tuhaf, eski bir araba
2580 | archer (noun): a person who shoots with a bow and arrow | loc: okçu
  EN TS: The archer is drawing his bow.
  tr TS: Okçu yayını geriyor.
  EN FS: The archer is drawing a sword.
  tr FS: Okçu kılıcını çekiyor.
  EN TP: a statue of an archer
  tr TP: bir okçu heykeli
  EN FP: a painting of an archer
  tr FP: bir okçu tablosu
2581 | flute (noun): a long thin instrument you blow across | loc: flüt
  EN TS: He is playing a bamboo flute.
  tr TS: Bambu flüt çalıyor.
  EN FS: He is playing a bamboo drum.
  tr FS: Bambu davul çalıyor.
  EN TP: playing a bamboo flute
  tr TP: bambu flüt çalmak
  EN FP: carving a bamboo flute
  tr FP: bambu flüt oymak
2583 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: keyif almak
  EN TS: She is enjoying the vibes.
  tr TS: Ortamdan keyif alıyor.
  EN FS: She is enjoying the pizza.
  tr FS: Pizzadan keyif alıyor.
  EN TP: enjoying the music
  tr TP: müzikten keyif almak
  EN FP: enjoying the sun
  tr FP: güneşten keyif almak
2584 | baptism (noun): a religious ceremony using water | loc: vaftiz
  EN TS: It's a baptism in a river.
  tr TS: Nehirde bir vaftiz bu.
  EN FS: It's a baptism in a church.
  tr FS: Kilisede bir vaftiz bu.
  EN TP: a baptism in the river
  tr TP: nehirde vaftiz
  EN FP: a church baptism
  tr FP: kilisede vaftiz
2586 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: dostluk
  EN TS: Best friendship ever: a giant robot and a little girl.
  tr TS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi dostluk: dev bir robot ve küçük bir kız.
  EN FS: Best friendship ever: a giant dog and a little girl.
  tr FS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi dostluk: dev bir köpek ve küçük bir kız.
  EN TP: an unlikely friendship
  tr TP: beklenmedik bir dostluk
  EN FP: a friendship bracelet
  tr FP: bir dostluk bilekliği
2594 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: öğrenmek
  EN TS: The robot is learning about itself.
  tr TS: Robot kendisi hakkında bir şeyler öğreniyor.
  EN FS: The robot is learning about cats.
  tr FS: Robot kediler hakkında bir şeyler öğreniyor.
  EN TP: a robot learning to read
  tr TP: okumayı öğrenen bir robot
  EN FP: a robot learning to fly
  tr FP: uçmayı öğrenen bir robot
2595 | grand piano (noun): a large piano with a big lid that opens up | loc: kuyruklu piyano
  EN TS: Someone left a grand piano outside.
  tr TS: Biri kuyruklu piyanoyu dışarıda unutmuş.
  EN FS: Someone left a grand piano inside.
  tr FS: Biri kuyruklu piyanoyu içeride unutmuş.
  EN TP: a grand piano outside
  tr TP: dışarıda bir kuyruklu piyano
  EN FP: a grand piano inside
  tr FP: içeride bir kuyruklu piyano
2600 | beetle (noun): an insect with a hard shiny back | loc: böcek
  EN TS: Bro, two beetles are chilling.
  tr TS: Kanka, iki böcek takılıyor.
  EN FS: Bro, two snails are chilling.
  tr FS: Kanka, iki salyangoz takılıyor.
  EN TP: beetles crawling on leaves
  tr TP: yapraklarda gezinen böcekler
  EN FP: beetles flying over flowers
  tr FP: çiçeklerin üstünde uçan böcekler
2601 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: diz çökmek
  EN TS: The man is kneeling in prayer.
  tr TS: Adam diz çökmüş, dua ediyor.
  EN FS: The man is sitting in prayer.
  tr FS: Adam oturmuş, dua ediyor.
  EN TP: kneeling on stone ground
  tr TP: taş zeminde diz çökmek
  EN FP: kneeling on a soft sofa
  tr FP: yumuşak bir kanepede diz çökmek
2602 | ski (verb): to slide over snow on long narrow boards | loc: kayak yapmak
  EN TS: They are skiing down so fast.
  tr TS: Aşağı doğru çok hızlı kayak yapıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are skiing up so fast.
  tr FS: Yukarı doğru çok hızlı kayak yapıyorlar.
  EN TP: skiing down a steep slope
  tr TP: dik bir yamaçta kayak yapmak
  EN FP: skiing on a flat road
  tr FP: düz bir yolda kayak yapmak
2603 | sheet music (noun): printed paper with the notes of a piece | loc: nota
  EN TS: The sheet music is handwritten.
  tr TS: Notalar elle yazılmış.
  EN FS: The sheet music is printed out.
  tr FS: Notalar yazıcıdan çıkmış.
  EN TP: old handwritten sheet music
  tr TP: eski, elle yazılmış notalar
  EN FP: new printed sheet music
  tr FP: yeni basılmış notalar
2604 | lifeless (adjective): dead-looking, with no life or leaves | loc: cansız
  EN TS: A lifeless tree, a green moon.
  tr TS: Cansız bir ağaç, yeşil bir ay.
  EN FS: A lifeless tree, a white moon.
  tr FS: Cansız bir ağaç, beyaz bir ay.
  EN TP: a lifeless tree on rocks
  tr TP: kayalarda cansız bir ağaç
  EN FP: a lifeless potted tree
  tr FP: saksıda cansız bir ağaç
2605 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: kucağında sallamak
  EN TS: He is cradling a baby.
  tr TS: Bir bebeği kucağında sallıyor.
  EN FS: He is cradling a lamb.
  tr FS: Bir kuzuyu kucağında sallıyor.
  EN TP: to cradle a baby
  tr TP: bebeği kucağında sallamak
  EN FP: to cradle a phone
  tr FP: telefonu kucağında tutmak
2606 | clockwork (noun): machinery of gears and springs inside a clock | loc: saat mekanizması
  EN TS: Her head is pure clockwork.
  tr TS: Kafası baştan sona saat mekanizması.
  EN FS: Her head is pure glass.
  tr FS: Kafası baştan sona cam.
  EN TP: a head full of clockwork
  tr TP: saat mekanizmasıyla dolu bir kafa
  EN FP: a clockwork toy mouse
  tr FP: kurmalı oyuncak bir fare
2607 | wear (verb): to be dressed in something | loc: giymek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The cats wear formal coats.
  tr TS: Kediler resmi paltolar giyiyor.
  EN FS: The dogs wear formal coats.
  tr FS: Köpekler resmi paltolar giyiyor.
  EN TP: cats wearing long coats
  tr TP: uzun palto giymiş kediler
  EN FP: cats wearing collars
  tr FP: tasma takmış kediler
2611 | buckle (noun): the metal fastener that closes a belt | loc: toka
  EN TS: His belt has a metal buckle.
  tr TS: Kemerinde metal bir toka var.
  EN FS: His bag has a metal buckle.
  tr FS: Çantasında metal bir toka var.
  EN TP: a metal belt buckle
  tr TP: metal bir kemer tokası
  EN FP: buckling a seatbelt
  tr FP: emniyet kemeri takmak
2612 | bud (noun): a flower that has not opened yet | loc: tomurcuk
  EN TS: Two buds have not opened yet.
  tr TS: İki tomurcuk henüz açmamış.
  EN FS: Two buds have opened already.
  tr FS: İki tomurcuk çoktan açmış.
  EN TP: two closed red buds
  tr TP: kapalı iki kırmızı tomurcuk
  EN FP: two open red buds
  tr FP: açık iki kırmızı tomurcuk
2614 | minaret (noun): the tall thin tower of a mosque | loc: minare
  EN TS: Two boys are near a minaret.
  tr TS: İki oğlan bir minarenin yanında.
  EN FS: Two girls are near a minaret.
  tr FS: İki kız bir minarenin yanında.
  EN TP: walking toward a minaret
  tr TP: bir minareye doğru yürümek
  EN FP: climbing up a minaret
  tr FP: bir minareye tırmanmak
2618 | handwriting (noun): words written by hand, not printed | loc: el yazısı
  EN TS: The handwriting is in cursive.
  tr TS: El yazısı bitişik harflerle.
  EN FS: The handwriting is in print.
  tr FS: El yazısı düz harflerle.
  EN TP: faded cursive handwriting
  tr TP: solmuş, bitişik el yazısı
  EN FP: neat printed handwriting
  tr FP: düzgün, düz harfli el yazısı
2621 | mast (noun): the tall pole that stands up from a deck | loc: direk
  EN TS: The mast has lots of rigging.
  tr TS: Direkte bir sürü halat var.
  EN FS: The mast has lots of flags.
  tr FS: Direkte bir sürü bayrak var.
  EN TP: a tall mast with rigging
  tr TP: halatlı, yüksek bir direk
  EN FP: a mast with pirate flags
  tr FP: korsan bayraklı bir direk
2622 | statue of liberty (noun): a green statue of a woman holding a torch | loc: Özgürlük Anıtı
  EN TS: A tiny Statue of Liberty!
  tr TS: Minicik bir Özgürlük Anıtı!
  EN FS: A tiny Eiffel Tower!
  tr FS: Minicik bir Eyfel Kulesi!
  EN TP: a mini Statue of Liberty
  tr TP: mini bir Özgürlük Anıtı
  EN FP: a Statue of Liberty costume
  tr FP: Özgürlük Anıtı kostümü
2623 | ivy (noun): a green plant that climbs walls and trees | loc: sarmaşık
  EN TS: Ivy covers the bookshelf.
  tr TS: Sarmaşık kitaplığı kaplıyor.
  EN FS: Snow covers the bookshelf.
  tr FS: Kar kitaplığı kaplıyor.
  EN TP: a bookshelf covered in ivy
  tr TP: sarmaşık kaplı bir kitaplık
  EN FP: a castle covered in ivy
  tr FP: sarmaşık kaplı bir şato
2625 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: mühendis
  EN TS: The engineer dreams of cranes.
  tr TS: Mühendis vinçlerin hayalini kuruyor.
  EN FS: The engineer dreams of horses.
  tr FS: Mühendis atların hayalini kuruyor.
  EN TP: an engineer's hard hat
  tr TP: bir mühendisin baretı
  EN FP: an engineer at a computer
  tr FP: bilgisayar başında bir mühendis
2626 | bald (adjective): having no hair on the head | loc: kel
  EN TS: A city lives in his bald head.
  tr TS: Kel kafasında bir şehir yaşıyor.
  EN FS: A farm lives in his bald head.
  tr FS: Kel kafasında bir çiftlik yaşıyor.
  EN TP: a bald head in profile
  tr TP: profilden kel bir kafa
  EN FP: a bald head with glasses
  tr FP: gözlüklü kel bir kafa
2629 | pigtails (noun): hair tied in two bunches, one each side | loc: iki örgü
  EN TS: Her hair is in two pigtails.
  tr TS: Saçı iki örgü yapılmış.
  EN FS: Her hair is in two buns.
  tr FS: Saçı iki topuz yapılmış.
  EN TP: two long braided pigtails
  tr TP: iki uzun örgü
  EN FP: two short curly pigtails
  tr FP: iki kısa, kıvırcık örgü
2631 | lens (noun): the round glass in glasses or a camera | loc: mercek
  EN TS: Her goggles have round lenses.
  tr TS: Gözlüğünün yuvarlak mercekleri var.
  EN FS: Her goggles have no lenses.
  tr FS: Gözlüğünün hiç merceği yok.
  EN TP: round tinted lenses
  tr TP: yuvarlak, renkli mercekler
  EN FP: a lens on a camera
  tr FP: bir kamera merceği
2633 | beam (noun): a line of light shining from something | loc: ışın | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: That tree is a disco. Look at the beams!
  tr TS: O ağaç tam bir disko. Işınlara bak!
  EN FS: That tree is a disco. Look at the birds!
  tr FS: O ağaç tam bir disko. Kuşlara bak!
  EN TP: beams of coloured light
  tr TP: renkli ışık ışınları
  EN FP: wooden beams of a roof
  tr FP: bir çatının ahşap kirişleri
2634 | cork (noun): the round plug that closes a bottle neck | loc: mantar tıpa
  EN TS: Every bottle has a cork.
  tr TS: Her şişenin bir mantar tıpası var.
  EN FS: Every bottle has a straw.
  tr FS: Her şişenin bir pipeti var.
  EN TP: bottles closed with corks
  tr TP: mantar tıpalı şişeler
  EN FP: a cork board with notes
  tr FP: notlu bir mantar pano
2635 | magnolia (noun): a big cup-shaped flower that grows on a tree | loc: manolya
  EN TS: The magnolia is creamy white.
  tr TS: Manolya krem beyazı.
  EN FS: The magnolia is bright yellow.
  tr FS: Manolya parlak sarı.
  EN TP: an open magnolia flower
  tr TP: açmış bir manolya çiçeği
  EN FP: a magnolia tree
  tr FP: bir manolya ağacı
2641 | ray (noun): a narrow line of light from a bright source | loc: ışın | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Rays are filling the sky!
  tr TS: Işınlar gökyüzünü dolduruyor!
  EN FS: Rays are filling the room!
  tr FS: Işınlar odayı dolduruyor!
  EN TP: golden rays of light
  tr TP: altın ışık ışınları
  EN FP: rays through a window
  tr FP: pencereden giren ışınlar
2648 | ant (noun): a tiny insect that lives in large groups | loc: karınca
  EN TS: This ant is bigger than me!
  tr TS: Bu karınca benden büyük!
  EN FS: This bee is bigger than me!
  tr FS: Bu arı benden büyük!
  EN TP: a huge black ant
  tr TP: kocaman siyah bir karınca
  EN FP: a huge ant hill
  tr FP: kocaman bir karınca yuvası
2649 | goggles (noun): big glasses with a band that cover your eyes | loc: koruyucu gözlük
  EN TS: Those goggles are massive!
  tr TS: Şu koruyucu gözlükler devasa!
  EN FS: Those earrings are massive!
  tr FS: Şu küpeler devasa!
  EN TP: glowing goggles on her eyes
  tr TP: gözlerinde parlayan koruyucu gözlük
  EN FP: goggles for swimming
  tr FP: bir yüzme gözlüğü
2651 | spots (noun): small round marks on a surface | loc: benekler
  EN TS: The red roof has white spots.
  tr TS: Kırmızı çatıda beyaz benekler var.
  EN FS: The red roof has black spots.
  tr FS: Kırmızı çatıda siyah benekler var.
  EN TP: a cap with white spots
  tr TP: beyaz benekli bir şapka
  EN FP: a dog with white spots
  tr FP: beyaz benekli bir köpek
